They created the Land of Fiction as a diversion but grew bored and abandoned it.
Expectations are tricky.
for the Lord thy God is with thee whithersoever thou goest" Joshua 1:9
Lulu DK | Child is quite a mood lifter, don't you think? I love its happy, lighthearted vibe. So many of the prints feel like summer. I definitely find myself wishing that all of the above were indoor/outdoor fabrics so that I could use them by the pool...and really, that would've made sense for a kids collection anyway.
the barrettes are made of street maps, cut into a tear-drop shape, then rachel hand-draws a pretty feathered print onto each one (you can specify any color you want).
Cast : Shindong, Nari, Sun Hee (OC)
Sobe - Connotations (applied to lower lash line and winging out with MAC 266)
“It’s in a place that we can’t see. I’m not sure exactly where,” Ella tells her.
LOU ANN BARTON: Don't Slander Me
As you may have noticed among all these activities, there's not alot of writing going on.
For example, you come into work on Monday tired, sleepy, annoyed, and just don’t wanna be bugged. This will lead to your Monday being bad, because you already think it is going to be. Now if you come in happy, ready to get some things going, and start moving earlier, Monday is going to be good, because you already have it planned.
Some other staffing changes are in the works which would put me into a supervisory role and perhaps allow me to run things the way they're supposed to be run.
And then they knew the perilous Rock,
We had a lot of fun, not least because Rosemary had dressed in Regency costume and gave us some inside information on what the well dressed lady would wear then.
It is made with Environmental responsibility and my family's health in mind.
I once read a great article about how a parent is like an architect, erecting a building, little by little.
You have already seen a vast amount of my wardrobe over the past five months.
However, I'm not altogether sure that his his entourage have much of a plan. Agreeing with everyone about everything isn't a way to win hearts and minds. It just makes him sound like a grade A jerk.
I've actually been joking a lot with my other friends with kids this age about how difficult it is to change their diapers when to my surprise I saw the Huggies Little Movers Slip-On Diapers commercial. I laughed the entire time at all of those adorable wiggly babies because I know EXACTLY why they made this product! What a relief! I also laughed at the "step-by-step" catch-and-release directions the commercial gives about how to quickly slide on the diaper and let the baby go! I can't wait to find these at the store! They cannot stock these soon enough!
So while I ended the precious first draft of Pardon Falls, I begin what truly makes 82,000 words into something meaningful. And yes, I did write “the end” at the bottom of page 287, but we all know it really is only the beginning.
The Savaric by C.F.A. Voysey, 1897, England, Arts and Crafts Movement. Light blue on a dark blue background -- the blues are just a bit on the teal (greenish) side. Viewed at a distance, the trees form a pleasing fishscale pattern. Original piece: wallpaper, color woodblock, hand printed on paper. Lovingly hand restored and prepared for print by a professional graphic artist experienced in art restoration.
HaandBryggeriet Odin's Tipple
Can you believe that Newbaby2010 ver.4.0 will be 1?
As for the Toby jugs, well Lee had become something of a collector over the years, and these 4 were specially commissioned to represent each member of the current line up of the band. They still exist, and even feature in the Oil City Confidential movie, along with a hastily made addition of a Wilko Toby! (I understand Chris keeps the originals in his office).
But I think it's interesting that sign-carrying is going to be outlawed, just as the trendy kids have decided it means nothing. What a coincidence!
Betsy!? Our resident math expert? If a rat is eating .15 mg of oleuropein per kilogram of body weight, the equivalent necessary for a 100 pound human being would be…? A kilogram is roughly half a pound (1 lb = 0.453592 kilograms). So body weight is 45.3592 kilograms. 45.3592 x 0.15 mg = 6.75 mg. So 50 mg of oleuropein would be more than enough, wouldn’t it?
When Dear Hubby called me from the airport this morning once he'd gotten thru security he said, "I hear you had a tornado warning last nite!" Say what?! That was the first I'd heard of that! I do remember waking up sometime in the nite, hearing thunder and the rain pelting the roof, but I've grown to love the sound of it after living here for a year now. It doesn't frighten me...it lulls me to sleep. Deep sleep, obviously. Dear Hubby said "Didn't you watch the weather last nite?" I told him whenever he's gone for any length of time I don't watch TV at all unless I decide to watch something I have taped on the DVR. When I slid the drapes shut last nite around 8 pm it was dusky and looked normal to me. Well, people here tell us Michigan weather can change in a minute and I guess they're right. You know, I thought I heard an alarm go off last nite but I thought it was on a car. Maybe it was the tornado warning? I don't know. When I picked up our drapes at the dry cleaner's this morning the woman who helped me asked me if we'd had any damage from the wind last nite at our house. I must have been unconscious. I didn't even hear it.
So, for regular meetings, that's it for this year as the school where we meet will have school play next week and school disco the week after. We do still have two events before Christmas, one for the unit and one for units across the whole town, so more to come.
5. Ballroom dancing. I love dance of any kind, but especially the ballroom and so-called social dances - waltz, foxtrot, cha-cha, samba, west coast swing, bachata, you name it. I performed and competed as part of a college ballroom dance company when I was in undergrad. I even built myself a wonderfully tacky ballgown when we started competing at the level for which costumes are required.I haven't competed in seven years (not to worry - quitting competitions was one of the best decisions I ever made). But ballroom dancing socially can still give me a feeling akin to what I imagine euphoria must be like.
“The movement started in part because of frustrations over the bailouts and how the government handled the economic collapse of 2009,” said protester John Dennehy, 29.
Many people dread The Tower even more than Death or The Devil, but again, perspective plays an important role. Do we choose to focus on the lightning, the forcible removal of old paradigms, the free fall, or the fire? How does the implied trauma of this card shift if we acknowledge that the old paradigms no longer worked? The Tower was William Butler Yeats’ very favorite card, and it’s one of mine, too. It has a personal meaning for me, as I associate it with my 1998 brain injury, which arrived like a lightning strike and threw my entire sense of identity, thought patterns, and ways of being into a rocky sea. But you know what? That brain injury was the best thing that ever happened to me. Destroying the old reality opened an expansive and yet strangely intimate reality far beyond and far preferable to what I’d known before.
with IOWA summer storms.
“I don’t know,” Roy told her. “Let’s get her to the couch.”
They also decided to offer over 400 well-chosen Belgian brews
Holy ereader Batman! Now you would have to prise my device out of my cold dead hands...and then I would come back as a zombie and eat your brains!
Sorry for the boring photos the last few days but it will make the reveal photos all the more interesting, right?
To illustrate what this kind of thing is doing to our girls, here are some statistics I dug up:
Solid as steel
We believe in one God, the Father Almighty, Maker of all things visible and invisible.
I begin most days by revising the previous day’s work. It’s almost like tuning an instrument and practising scales: ensuring that my ear is true and that I’m right on the ball. I read my text out loud, or under my breath, and always use a second colour to revise the previous day’s work (and a third when I revisit that) so that I can see at a glance how things are coming on.
One of the great favors that George Romero did for the horror industry (inadvertent, I’m certain) was to leave Night of the Living Dead without a copyright notice, putting the film in the public domain, thus giving every other filmmaker in the world the opportunity to make more zombie films. The film is thought by many to be a sort of allegory for race relations, although this was never intended according to George Romero—it just happens to have worked out that way. Instead, it is a ferociously original idea for a horror film, so original that it spawned hundreds of imitators.
With the festive season fast approaching its a good time to get a new TV to make the most of your Christmas viewing. The LG 50PS3000 is an excellent buy and well worth the reasonable price.
Maybe you did.
Eryana writes:
Ya know?
Singapore 918146.
For the time being, Staten Island is still part of New York City, and there are a number of very worthwhile things to see in this borough, as well as a few big surprises. You will see that here this week :)
2078.E-I/19/1999. “Chicago’s College Bows to Popular Culture.” Hickory Daily Record, Hickory, North Carolina, January 19, 1999, p. A-4; University of Chicago Maroon, February 5, 1999, p. 9. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(12), above, pp. 863-64.)
Okay, so maybe there’s a little hint of green. I’ve always had an olive complexion, but maybe it’s looking a little more chartreuse lately.
one thing i love to do is make a handful of items that coordinate with each other.
Beat the first 4 ingredients at medium speed with a stand mixer until blended. Gradually add flour, beating just until combined.
Beat together cream cheese, egg, sugar, and vanilla. Melt white chocolate and beat that in as well.
the thought was so inspiring...
As an editor, I sometimes think of an author’s submission as dough. My job is to make it rise so that, when baked, the final product is a healthy loaf with character. The perfect amount of kneading lets it blossom, but too much attention leaves it dense and mechanical. Finding the line between respecting the author’s unique voice and adhering to the developerWorks conventions is sometimes tough. Since developerWorks readers expect concise writing and precision of language from their authors, I’ve learned to search for the simplest way to ensure that each author’s words have the greatest impact. Sometimes, I even find it. The final product is a website that offers consistent content from varying voices.
And Publisher’s Weekly says, "Haycak creates a realistic portrait of a teenage girl whose life is spiraling out of control . . . With painstaking yet gratifying care, Haycak eventually starts Mia along the path of self-realization and forgiveness."
I felt embarrassed telling y'all that my family's go-to on busy nights is spaghetti (courtesy of Butch Cassidy.) It's true, but I felt like I should offer up a few more recipes to help out on busy nights. This is the best chicken trick I have up my sleeve!
A plastic bottle bobbed in the brown canal water. One of the small, white ones shaped with a handle, and a green lid. Rel thought about stopping to fish it out - it was filthy, but if it was watertight enough to float it was worth at least a good meal and a drink. But he didn’t have his fishing rod with him, and trying to reach it with a broken-off branch would risk falling in. If he turned up in front of the Sherriff sopping wet, he might well get sent to Dora in case he caught cold, and then there was no way he’d get free in time for Van Raighan.
The majority of the airborne (portion of) releases to date were in mid-March, and the most significant fallout (on land) went to the northwest (including some beyond the evacuation zone, resulting in the new expansion to some areas to avoid long-term, gradual exposure).
Oh lord, umm let me see… I was very honoured to work with Lily Tomlin, she is just so professional and such a sweet human being. I did a promo with Danny Trejo and you know how he always plays those mean characters? Well he is the opposite of that, nice, polite, generous, just a wonderful person to work with. And of course everybody from ‘Eastbound & Down’, from Danny McBride to Steve Little, Jody, David, the most down–to-earth people I’ve ever worked with in and outside of Hollywood, just refreshing people.
20. My mother taught me HUMOR.
Writing can be so therapeutic and help us walk through those difficult places in life. Our story can also help someone else going through a similar circumstance.
18. The fruitfulness of perseverance.
The follow-up to ‘She Stood There Laughing’ sees Stephen Foster continue his love hate relationship with Tony Pulis, although now we are in the Premiership he has more, albeit grudging respect for Mr Pulis. Maybe more for Stoke fans due to the ‘in’ jokes about various Oatcake message board members (the Stoke City MB and very good it is too) but the general fan of footie books will relate to fans frustrations, joy and despair as the season progresses. It is our first season in the Premiership (we were of course regulars in the old First Division but not since the mid-80′s).
One lucky winner. Value: $12
“Our fans have made tremendous progress in eradicating offensive singing over the last few seasons and this has been widely acknowledged by members of the Joint Action Group set up by the Scottish Government last year, politicians and the police, to name a few.
It brought back a lot of memories for us about the Playboy, and how much history was lost when he passed away, and how much our visitor had resembled him in feature, turn of phrase and gesture. There is no mistaking a member of the Biker clan. It was the type of sodden winter afternoon, overcast and windy, and certainly the type of excursion, that made you think about mortality. It was an interesting day.
We got a hot crustacean band
But take a trip back out to the desert. Turn up the volume and feel these songs. While I’ve tried to focus on the music here, there’s interesting stuff to read about the title (they considered The Desert Songs and The Two Americas as working titles), the cover art and photo shoot (photographer Anton Corbijn was lucky to find what he was looking for: a single Joshua Tree, though they are usually found in groups), as well as the recording and production by Daniel Lanois and Brian Eno.
Dogs is incomplete. Shine On Parts I-V cuts at the end of side A and continues after a break on Side B.
So is that it? Were those early dreams just fantasies? Were the Apollo landings flukes? Or evidence that an earlier generation was better, or more daring, than us?
To see more of Midnightcoiler beautiful work:
Yesterday I got a text from Arete and it said something like..."uncross your legs". Actually, it said that exactly. I found this annoying and told him I was going to hit him.
I will still visit blogs that have CAPTCHA; I just may not be able to comment as often as I might otherwise. It can be time consuming trying to identify the CAPTCHA word, and I just don't have that kind of time!
2010.09.13 India Pulwama 1 0 Lashkar-e-Toiba radicals intrude into a local soldier's home and shoot him to death.
3 dashes of Angostura bitters
“The World Cup will also be a particularly attractive target for Al Qaeda. Estimates range at between 300,00 and 500,000 for the number of foreign tourists who will be in South Africa during the World Cup. This could make the tournament one of the largest gatherings of Westerners outside of western Europe and the United States.
Seasons Come, Seasons Go
I was concerned that the gluten-free flours would create a dough that spread too much if I used an equal amount of butter, so I cut back on that just a little. I also used molasses as part of the sugar because I thought it might moisten the stickier flours a little more and help bind them with the rest of the ingredients. Using the egg as the starter 2 oz. in the ratio, my ratio ended up being 1:3:4:4 -- 1 part egg: 3 parts fat: 4 parts sugar: 4 parts flour. (2 oz. egg: 6 oz. butter: 8 oz. sugar: 8 oz. flour)
Or what is
And that's why I flashed back on that particular moment in Pierrot le fou. Godard, early in his filmmaking career, may have made films that, on a certain level, expressed a certain yearning for life to be like a movie. But he knew, deep down, even literature, sound or image had limits on accessing the various human truths of a situation. The distance is always there, however much a medium tries to bring you the cold, hard facts.
That evening was dance concert (which Ai was in). I went and sat with an alum friend of mine (actually, she was my partner in our concert routine last year). I was on edge needless to say, but concert is tons of fun, especially Saturday night since that’s when all the alums go and yell crazy things at the dancers (this is encouraged behavior).
So I got Carrie, Emma Holdcroft and Kitty Shaw, (at proper last minute to voice Sophia Welling as I had lost my actor who was to play Dr Carpenter, scheduling difficulties, wot can u do??) and together I created a linear context teaser trailer covering the main relationship that would progress through the film; as well as show elements of the world around them. Similar in context to the original film. This time around I had a tailor made outfit for Emma my leading lady, from Erica Pickles who runs Sewed Souls. Emma’s skirt and corset are both one of a kind hand made =)
Betsy and I went to Niagara Falls in 2002. We stayed on the Canadian side of the border, and in addition to visiting the falls we also visited some of the historical sites in the area.
Waiting for a taste;
The experience of walking for hours on unfriendly terrain, trekking poles in hand or hugging the sheer face rocks while climbing a frighteningly huge cliff and the grueling last 11 hours that will take you, one step and one breath at the time to the top of this magical mountain.
Don't forget Thomas' Book is on sale at Old South Antique Mall!!
She does many many fantastic things, all while struggling threw her own daily pain. She is an amazing women, an amazing mother, an amazing babysitter, and an amazing friend. She is definitely a part of our village.
As Buddhists, we are bound to study and understand the law of causality (cause and effect, or the predictable results of our behaviors) and then –
I am SO sorry for the lack of posts on the blog lately but life has been crazy for MacKenzie and I. I have spent the last couple of day in Atlanta attending business meetings and MacKenzie was finishing up her last week of college. The good news is MacKenzie is home for the summer!!! Be on the lookout for tons of outfit posts for the next 3 months. We are so excited to put our creative brains together and share our love of fashion with you! I am obsessed with my new Steve Madden wedges for summer. They add the perfect amount of flair to any outfit. What are your go to shoes for the summer?
This list of goat-monikered metal bands recalled an impromptu contest we had in the SXSW badge print room this year. The question was, "How many bands playing this year have 'black' as the first word in their name? As long as 'black' is first everything counts, i.e. Blackie." I guessed 12, the winner guessed 15, it was actually 18. Dang.
I'm thinking gray walls with black, white, and green decor. I for sure want to keep the storage containers I already have and just add to them. Then, I'll punch it up with kelly green accents. Lily will even be taken care of with new pet supplies. Her items have to coordinate too!
When calling people, Thai people add a word “Khum” to their names. “Khum” is unisex, which can means Miss,Mr, Sir,Mrs, and Madam. In Thai companies, office clerks often address each other with Pee and Nong. Pee means older brother and sisters while Nong means younger brothers and sisters. The addresses sound warm and intimate. Therefore , if you travel in Thailand or meet the family of your girlfriend, remember this.
"We've got to decide what our priorities are," the president said today at the White House. "Do we keep tax loopholes for oil companies, or do we put teachers back to work? Should we keep tax breaks for millionaires and billionaires, or should we invest in education and technology and infrastructure?"
Of course it was the reaction of people, in both the mainstream media and social media, that brought this issue to international attention, so let us play an oh-so-modest part in that reaction with this little batch of words and a song.
Sir Alex conceded that the advantage could prove significant with the two sides locked neck-and-neck at the summit of the league table after United’s derby defeat.
Sizing
In my design work putting the time and thought into coming up with a design solution that is everything the client wants, brings me great joy.
- Brady under pressure as sex abuse victims talk of cover-up
"Ew British men have such icky teeth" All the guys in the office looked positively woebegone and while I felt sorry for them I had to laugh
"California Dreamin'" San Diego Padres & Oakland Athletics
IT WAS SEAN'S BIRTHDAY!
I wonder if a sacramental model has something to offer here? In celebrating the sacraments, the church (the community gathered together in some historic continuity) meets around certain actions identifying the contemporary presence of the same deity as the historic texts name. The performance of the sacraments includes narrative, invocation and attentiveness, in bringing the temporal and physical world into conjunction with the eternal and spiritual world. The two are held in a mutually explanatory tension.
Take good care of your skin.
Security Services (SSS) on
However, after a while, and after a bit of living, the shininess may have rubbed off a little; neither of you may feel like the latest model, with the latest features. There is tremendous temptation to discard that formerly sexy new gadget, to hide it away in the attic, give it away or to leave it out for the dustman, just another consumer item which has had its day.
On another note, I realize how many idioms I use ... Often I have said "Ashu will have a cow." "If you are this noise, Grandma will have a cow." .... The other day we were working on reading, and Aki excitedly said, "Mommy, I am going to read like a cow!" Is that a correct use of the expression?........................
I looked up and before me was a person that resembled someone who maybe sort-of used to look like me. While my friends had more complementary shades, I think my reddish hue hair had thrown the heavy-handed make-up artist, so she’d decided to just have fun with my face as a palette instead. The worst was yet to come.
knit 3, purl 1 for 1 inch
"Well passion is an important part of life." He says beaming. "So I need examples of you displaying passion in the team."
Grading has begun and it is anticipated that the school will be open in September 2007.
There is a difference between fashion and style. In the words of Edna Woolman Chase, former editor of Vogue Magazine,
But listening doesn’t come so easy.
You know what else is working but I don't have a photo of? breaking the cycle of an old bad nuerotic habit.....I am trying to stop picking and biting at my nails. I got a set of acrylic gel nails put on a month ago. That stopped the old pattern right there. I just filed them down and soaked off the acrylic gel to the natural nail and have a pretty decent manicure that I have no desire to pick at. Really, really working on this and so far it is working. gotta keep working at it.
The agency’s move to exclude online information comes a year after Mr. Coburn used material he found online to challenge the disability finding of Stanley Thornton Jr., a man who lives part time as an adult baby.
When I first started blogging back in January, K. Andrew was getting ready to move across the country so she hosted a Cricky Across the 50 Blog Hop. (Click the link to check out my submission). I found out about this blog hop and that's how I met K. Andrew. She was so sweet about letting me join the hop. I had no idea what I was doing but she was so helpful.
For those who would like to see the finished card, it will be in my next post.
But if I can’t offer you a winning formula maybe I can at least offer you a couple of do’s and don’ts. For instance, don’t expect to get it right first time. Ask yourself, has this idea of mine got legs? Could it hold up for three, four or five episodes of 3400 words each or is it best suited to a one thousand-word “moment in time” story? What about my characters? Are they complex enough to hold the reader’s interest or have I just created stereotypes? And when I write ‘End of Part One’ will anyone care enough to buy next week’s magazine so they can find out what happens next?
I am grateful that it was around this time I started reading about natural learning. I learned the theory that kids don't need to be taught how to do things, because they will learn what they need when they are ready. I backed off. No more teaching my son how to walk. I got more comfortable answering the question, He's not walking yet? with something like Why would he want to do that when he can crawl so fast?
Professional sound systems vary greatly in terms of size and features. Some sound systems are portable and others are fixed. Audio systems are designed for different locales and acoustics, some will serve well to address a single room of listeners and others can address stadium size crowds. The advantage of having a professional sound system is that they deliver superior sound to meet your needs.
M 28 – This mag 6.78 easily showed stars across the core at 70x, appearing almost 3D in depth.
Bake homemade treats made from natural or organic ingredients for your friends and family to avoid extra plastic waste from store-bought foods. The Daily Green has a great list of healthier desserts sure to tantalize your taste buds.
I also hit 5,000 Twitter followers this week. I remember when I was hoping to just get 100.
She smiles
Before I give you the recipe for this deliciously easy chocolate pudding - some food news! As most of you know, I've been working in the food realm for a few years now and, as of a couple weeks ago, started a new position as a Food Specialist for Canadian Living. Canadian will know the magazine I'm sure, and for all my non-Canadian readers - I hope you take a few minutes to take a look at the magazine's website.
DNA testing for blood alcohol levels of the driver, the
Using 50 years of official data from Chile’s National Institute of Statistics (1957-2007), the authors looked at factors likely to affect maternal mortality, such as years of education, per capita income, total fertility rate, birth order, clean water supply, sanitary sewer, and childbirth delivery by skilled attendants. They also analyse the effect of historical educational and maternal health policies, including legislation that has prohibited abortion in Chile since 1989, on maternal mortality.
So lets look at that Mauna Loa dataset. And at what year is the measurement just over 360 as in the Bradley picture and is today 380 just as it appears in the NASA graph – ftp://ftp.cmdl.noaa.gov/ccg/co2/trends/co2_mm_mlo.txt :
The strong NNE winds bringing cold air and wind chill were enough reason to keep people in today, so I’m going to let the pictures do the talking. If you’ve seen some of my kite surfing shots in the last week, you might have spotted one man who loves taking to the air, and this morning I was lucky to catch him before he entered the water.
903 **D-V/3/1985. “The Challenge of Boccaccio’s Decameron.” First Friday Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2001(6), above, pp. 270-86.)
"The essence of Mr. Bush's big government conservatism is a trade-off. To gain free-market reforms and expand individual choice, he's willing to broaden programs and increase spending.... When I coined the phrase "big government conservative" years ago, I had certain traits in mind. Mr. Bush has all of them. First, he's realistic. He understands why Mr. Reagan failed to reduce the size of the federal government and why Newt Gingrich and the GOP revolutionaries failed as well. The reason: People like big government so long as it's not a huge drag on the economy. So Mr. Bush abandoned the all-but-hopeless fight that Mr. Reagan and conservatives on Capitol Hill had waged to jettison the Department of Education. Instead, he's opted to infuse the department with conservative goals.... A second trait is a programmatic bent. Big government conservatives prefer to be in favor of things because that puts them on the political offensive."
The more conscious we are of our weaknesses, the more we can try to curb them before they damage ourselves and others. If we refuse to acknowledge our character failings, we will inevitably rationalize our flaws, and try to demonize and find fault with others. Just as our sages instituted numerous rabbinic prohibitions or fences so that we would not come to transgress Torah law, we must erect fences around our evil character traits to prevent us from stumbling. Rav Yisrael Salanter once said that a person is like a bird. He can fly ever so high but if his wings stop flapping, he will inevitably fall down. Working on our middot is a constant battle and we must be watchful at all times.
The Joker
Guy Fieri Salsa - 7 Pepper Killer Queso
The British people don’t care about reform of the second chamber and nor can they afford the debates, consultations, referenda and restructuring that such a move would necessitate. Clegg should put down his latest vanity project and get on with fixing the economy.
The diagnosis now is a pulled hamstring.
Goodness those titles are a mouthful, so from now on I’ll call these Penny Arcade 1 and Penny Arcade 2. That’s much easier to type.
Without goodbyes we grabbed our coats and slipped out the side door and into the main lobby. I managed to get her shoes on her and we headed out the door. My poor angel kept apologizing for ruining MY night. Then the tears began to fall again. You see we always end the Father-Daughter evening with a trip to Cold Stone Creamery - a wonderful ice cream shop. Explaining that she could have a rain-check on the ice cream and that we would do it as soon as she felt better she calmed back down.
The Way You Look Tonight - Jools Holland (Fred Astaire W’36)
Hershey and Penelope will be available on Paris show, if sold, they will for sure be missed !:)
Fables should be taught as fables, myths as myths, and miracles as poetic fancies. To teach superstitions as truths is a most terrible thing. The child mind accepts and believes them, and only through great pain and perhaps tragedy can he be in after years relieved of them. In fact, men will fight for a superstition quite as quickly as for a living truth — often more so, since a superstition is so intangible you cannot get at it to refute it, but truth is a point of view, and so is changeable.
Today's theme was either jacket over vest, or vest over jacket. Well, jacket over vest is just too easy! I had to go with the difficult option.
Continue to build relationships and you’ll soon realize you have a wealth of people who are eager to be your first edition book buyers too.
Although the tamil astrology free and remedial measures. The online astrologers can help you anticipate your future in different categories of life and teach you how to apply aspects in a mutable sign... and there may be a co-creator with the tamil astrology free can not just grab sentences out of the tamil astrology free since the tamil astrology free of this branch of astrology. Why? Aspects must assume that you can. Such as the tamil astrology free or monthly mini-readings done for the tamil astrology free or her troubles will begin, as well as burial places for astrologically minded pharaohs. In fact, religious Hindus cannot imagine life without Astrology. More and more Indians have started to veer away from astrology in your knowledge and insight.
-Approach undetected from the West and climb on the hill on the NW side of the map. Usually there are snipers there, take them out.
The position paper award is presented in recognition of pre-conference preparation. The position paper serves as a blueprint for building consensus and formulating and negotiating workable draft resolutions to resolve issues.
The chief attraction of this riveting murder mystery is the character of the detective. Kinsey has the appeal of a familiar series character; readers form a close emotional bond with her. She rises to the challenge of this seemingly unsolvable crime and overcomes the difficulties and dangers it involves. The character of the murdered victim is intriguing and complex; Violet acts as a magnet for all the males she meets, and uses her charms to break free of a stifling life in a narrow, provincial town.
Well, I sold my Gypsy last week and now I'm waiting for the latest release of Humphrey to arrive, so not patient, especially having seen the online show with Leanne Chivers yesterday on Create and Craft - I am a huge Humphrey fan & this latest delivery will ensure that I have EVERYTHING Humphrey.
And you? If you’ve taken His hand, you can hold your head high, too. You’re a princess just like me.
I could go on this whole rant about how tired I’m starting to get of this whole “Ichigo gets his ass kicked and then miraculously gets much stronger” narrative device that Bleach seems hell bent on using or the way that no one else in the ryoka has done anything remotely useful since they awakened to their spirit powers (which seems like ages and ages ago). I think I might have spoiled something for myself on wikipedia where Uryu actually does do some fighting next volume which is good because I think Ichigo is a cool dude and a serious bad-ass but I like the other people in his nakama just as much as him. Also, Tite Kubo really needs to slow down on introducing so many new characters. I know I’ve made this complaint before but it got out of hand this volume. There’s just a never-ending stream of new people to learn about and there’s not enough substance to their character for them to stick in my mind for the less than a few pages they are on at any given time even though they could become more important down the road.
Here are a few more Layouts from my Pregnancy Album.
I’m not sure how much it is going to help me in the long run, but it has got me focused back on the task of getting to know my characters – even if I am going over old ground listing the events I already know about, rather than ploughing ahead with the more complex happenings I’m been stuck on. The good thing is that once I’ve done it then I will have something to refer back to, to build on, to remind me of what I envisiged for each character when I was at this point in the planning process. It will probably take quite some time, but it is worth doing I think. The way I see it is that: No one said it was going to be easy. If it were easy we’d all be doing it, but I want to be one of the ones who at least attempted the challenge of it all.
I'm reminded of Michael Sorkin's book Local Code, in which an entire city is described and presented – without the use of a single image – through the droll recitation of absurdly specific building regulations.
In the 20th century, various entities of Newark Baseball all contributed to form one of the richest legacies anywhere in the country. In the very early 20th century, the first of these teams; the Newark Indians; existed as a Minor League team in both the old Eastern League and International League from 1902 through 1915 respectively.
There is one other startling prospect too; and that is the world will become colder. According to some scientists the reason that the earth has been warming since the industrial revolution is not due to the build up of carbon dioxide but because the sun has been quiet. A quiet sun means fewer magnetic storms, and since magnetic storms are thought to cause clouds, the skies have recently been clearer. Clear skies allow more energy from the sun to reach the earth's surface and it becomes warmer. Hence a period of greater solar activity will cause the earth to cool.
I finally called the orthopedist when, a week to the day of the inury, I tried to spring up onto a high chair and had a crippling burn stab up my leg. I had to face it, this was not getting better with rest.
Victims of crime in South Africa garner some sympathy, but it is sympathy on a sliding scale. Thus, worldwide, the press extended liberal pieties to liberal Nobel Prize-winning author Nadine Gordimer. She had survived an attack in her Johannesburg home. The Prince of Wales bewailed the murder of another prominent liberal, Anglo-Zulu War historian David Rattray. He was killed by six armed Zulus. When the nephew of South Africa’s finest novelist (no; it’s not J. M. Coetzee), the liberal André Brink, was shot and killed in front of his wife and daughter, The Economist took note:
Ask for His help - I think we forget this because of our thought process of the physical. We are physically here, we look for things, we can go and find something. When we ask for his help, though, it will be God guiding our steps, our thoughts, our minds, instead of ourselves searching aimlessly by our own weak strength.
This marriage was by all accounts successful. Emma gained power and responsibility as the years went on and had a son named Harthacnut, who became her favorite child. Although Cnut was 10 years younger than Emma, he died in 1035 and once again the succession of the throne of England was thrown into chaos. Cnut had children by a mistress who claimed the throne. Harthacnut was in Denmark and took his time returning to England despite Emma’s entreaties to come as soon as possible.
Well the receptionist had a great pair of tits.
Since the advent of the Occupy Wall Street movement, we've heard non-stop from conservative politicians that the occupiers, and President Obama in supporting their disillusionment with the plutocratic/oligarchic system we've devolved into in this country. It's been a repeated argument by Newt Gingrich and Mitt Romney, two men who certainly know something about class warfare, because they've been engaging in it for their entire careers.
# = with SIGMA as support
I have a dilemna, I am a true book lover and also a true movie lover! Every once in awhile this leads to a bit of conflict because a movie will be released that was based on a book that I have read and loved.
I'm proud that my suggestion to choose Dr. Michael Palmer for the Distinguished Author award was accepted. After his heartfelt, deeply personal speech Friday evening at the awards dinner at The Landings, I think everyone would agree that his work with addicted physicians in his home state of Massachusetts is a truly worthy endeavor.
'The first assailant was leaning with all his weight on Martin's shoulder and upper arm pressing him to the floor so that Martin seemed to be pinned to the floor.
Likewise, map 03. The River Caves contains connections to G and H. There is no reason that North need be the binding edge on the notebook; this map is rotated to better fit. Note also that there is nothing wrong with mapping to the edge of the grid!
However, notwithstanding this finding of validity by the TBA, the Court of Appeal (leading judgment by Jacob LJ) affirmed the first instance decision of Kitchin J and found the patent invalid.
Nowhere to Fall
Last night I had occasion to attend a Celebration of Autumn party which was heavily attended by the under-six crowd. In watching and listening to these children, I was struck by their directness; they asked for what they wanted, and were clear about what (and whom) they did and didn’t like. And I thought about the fact that we spend most of our adolescent and adult lives trying to recapture the honesty and candor we naturally had as young children. Most of us, I think, never do get back to that place of being really honest with ourselves and others. Yes, some of that is good boundaries, but a lot of it is fear-based. And I wonder what we’re afraid of … usually the consequence of honesty would be to part us from people and circumstances dragging us down and making us inauthentic.
Recently I’ve seen a number of references to “Big” being beautiful. What makes someone beautiful? It’s their intelligence, their humour, their sparkle in their eye, their smile, the way they speak kindly to everyone they meet, I could go on and on.
6. Cathy Claret - Le Lundi Au Soleil
Catch basins at the corner of Pacific and 6th Avenue will be modified during late April and early May. The DEP has approved the work. Installation will be coordinated with other trades in the area. Work will begin during the next two week period pending receipt of DEP approval.Arena Site Work
2 thank
Mostly i do my nails on my own now, unlike before where i have to take pics every step of the way. If you notice, whenever i post my picture tutorial i just compile them in 1 picture to make it easier & also to save space. So, you may see a different design/color on the tutorial picture compare to the finished work. It also shows how you can customized any designs that i have made on your own personal preference.
Absolutely essential listening for the fans of oldschool diy electronics,
Once in the area around the station you may want to drop by Au Laboureur at no 3, Grondwetplaats/Place de la Constitution. Like so many establishments in this part of town you will find a solid Mediterreanean influence - charming, exciting and with its large Morroccan population not without dangers at nighttime.
First impressions: With regard to how I came to read this book, the phrase "borrowed from a friend" is not entirely accurate. Let's call a spade a spade - I was book bullied into reading this. One of my pals in our writing group went on and on about how scary and awesome it was, so she happily pushed it into my hands. I'm so glad she did!
‘He is worthy of death,’ they answered.
as a very efficient fertiliser, the furrow
For me the parallels were stomach churning. As we drove away from meeting her, and after Gary’s comments, all I could think about was this: just say some fucker has Amy in a dungeon somewhere? Just say that poor, defenceless, girl is going through the same hell that Elizabeth suffered? A shiver went down my spine at even the thought of it.
Apparently, if you click that and join, you're automatically my friend. I believe the picture is from the very fabulous sjwhidden. As for the slogan on it, I have no idea what it means but it sounds sounds so aggressive that I just had to use it. Now that I'm done confusing you, StyleMob is another do-it-yourself street fashion site, and we all know I love to post up pictures of me in my pretty, pretty outfits on the internet. This site also allows for feedback, which me likey too, since my hair isn't big enough as it is. (Yes it's my hair that grows, not my head.)StyleMob also hosts contests. It definitely sets them apart from other street fashion sites I've seen, and I'm tickled pink to be able to say that they aren't scams. But what I was apprehensive about when I joined was that this site rates outfits.
But it’s a fun thing to write.
What kinds of songs do planets sing?
Good morning! I have another JustRite card to share with you today! It is a brand new set called, Starburst Medallion Labels. It has a bit of country charm to it, but I decided to go with that bright color scheme I've been attached to lately! ; ) I stamped the background medallion in turquoise and embossed it with clear embossing powder. I added a little rolled flower nestled in a vellum flower. I added a bit of tulle and a few acrylic pieces from Prima.
What I found, was that I am lazy about reading and all that information about ISO, Aperture, and Shutter Speed and trying to figure out how they all relate to each other was almost too much for me. Yet somehow, I got past it and found my own unique way of playing with my settings until I was able to capture a picture I was proud of. And you know, that felt really good. So I continued. Below is a shot of the fountain over in Bar Harbor where I became fascinated with the droplets of water.
Stuff We Mention:
I personally don’t watch My Life on the D-List; as I’ve said before, I can only take Griffin in small doses. But I do watch, and love, her stand-up specials. So it should come as little surprise that Official Book Club selection—a mixture of the two—was a mixed bag for me. On the one hand, I found Griffin’s early career fairly fascinating, even though the majority of it predates my life. On the other hand, the second half of the book felt like a bit of a rehash of stories I’ve seen on her comedy special (in fairness, I’m reading this book two years after it was released).
Audra is real, but she's also a sylph. An air elemental. She walks on the wind, can translate its alluring songs, and can even twist it into a weapon. She's also a guardian--Vane's guardian--and has sworn an oath to protect him at all costs. Even if it means sacrificing her own life.
135No weeping orphan saw his father's stores
When I bought my first camera, a Pentax K-1000, one of my first subjects was Andrew Carnegie Free Library & Music Hall. I lived two doors down, I was practicing with black and white film, and the massive, elegant building surrounded by tall trees was a feast for my eyes.
In the pre-Socratic world, artist, poets and oracles had the social function of expressing a sense of being. Weaving together edifying tales of gods and heroes with an apprehension of social and political circumstance, artists, poets and oracles produced cultural visions that qualified and colored everyday life. Poetic verse provided the Greeks with an emotional and affective framework, and a background for understanding issues of key cultural importance, such as the distinction between what was noble and base, the meaning of justice, beauty, and the good life. Poetic verses guided and edified life, establishing a resonance with everyday experience.
The thing that really puzzles me is how no-one has yet cracked the switching off mechanism; that moment when the brain loses its grip and begins to wander off and do its own thing. I shall be very excited if anyone ever uncovers that particular secret.
What a great event. We are so proud of what we were able to accomplish with the help of the best family and friends in the world! The Katie Starr Team will top $10,000.00 when the tally is done. I just sent the Foundation Fighting Blindness a new batch of checks that were given to me. We have until June to finalize this fiscal year so we will continue to add to our total so that the research for the treatments and a possible cure for Hereditary Retinal Blindness can go on! We will not stop until that happens!
the weekend is looking VERY wet .. bummer, right?! .. but i'm pretty ok with it - i've been having some hectic weekends, and well, it will be nice to just hang low, watch some movies, and wait for Sunday to come so i can hit up Target with its new designers coming in! (yayyyyy!!) .. i do have some planting to do tho, i have my seeds for the flowers i want to plant, so i will be doing that - and finishing up the kickplates of my stairs (painting them silver **ekk** so excited) .. so non-the-less i'll still be busy, but just staying home type of busy, instead of running around ..
Greg Mandel is a psychic detective whose skills have been augmented by powerful but dangerous biotechnology. Those abilities have won him success and almost killed him many times over. Little wonder that he has settled down to the life of a gentleman farmer.
It will be interesting, also, to see the consequence of the proposals on Housing Benefit and Social Housing. A couple of weeks ago, Dianne Abbott on "This Week", pointed out that most of her constituents on Housing Benefit were actually in work! They were in low paid jobs. But, cutting Housing Benefit will mean they will be unable to pay the high London rents on their accommodation. The likely consequence of that is that they may have to move out of London to where cheaper housing is available, but the consequence may mean they have to give up their jobs, due to commuting costs. If that happens London, and other such centres, will find they have an acute labour shortage, not just for high value, skilled workers, arising from the Tories Immigration Cap, but of all those workers needed in low paid, low status jobs, that keep the City running.
5) “The times of the Gentiles” politically, or governmentally, began about 600 B.C. (Jeremiah 50-52.). “The times of the Gentiles” spiritually, began when God sent temporary blindness upon Israel and the Risen LORD Jesus Christ sent the Apostle Paul to the Gentiles with the Ministry of Reconciliation.
But... technology when given the chance will betray you and Yahoo maps stuck the knife in. They sent me all over the place and so I called from the only landmark Margie had mentioned I could find and asked her to guide me in.
1 cup Sugar, according to taste
The blue and the dim and the dark cloths
, world class diving and the world’s second largest coral reef. There are the unique freshwater cenotes inland, jungle adventures, eco adventures, a collection of great golf courses, and a slate of truly unique interactive theme parks. The towns, from Playa del Carmen to smaller oceanfront villages, are charming, and all over the region is great food, great drink, and a plethora of lodging options.
2) AKA Bistro in Lincoln, one of my favorite restaurants, is gearing up for the Spring.
By alarm,
The original plan was to school year round and just take off the month of July- BUT with Kevin's travel and the time we wanted to spend as a family, we haven't done any school since the end of May. We'll start up the first week of August, after our last trip out of town- Myrtle Beach with my parents. :)
The melody and lyrics are pure Irving Berlin, and it remains one of the most well-known songs ever written. I have a particular affinity for the Great American Songbook--in fact, I devoted a whole blog to it. And well, this is certainly one of the absolute marvels of that amazing literature of popular music. I hear a song like this, and I get a bit sad for the sense of melody and beauty that has pretty much been lost in what we now call popular music.
For what you said
President Barack Obama delivered his State of the Union Address (SOTU) Wednesday morning (Manila time). There was this awkward moment when the President vowed to implement reforms by filing cases against former President Gloria Macapagal-Arroyo.
& thank you to all of you who visit the Gazebo House!
Seven decades later, the five remaining survivors of the raid led by then-Lt. Col. James H. “Jimmy” Doolittle recognize their prominent place in history. Nothing like it had ever been done before. But faced with an enemy that already had proved its ability to strike the U.S. homeland, 80 brave men volunteered for what had all the makings of a suicide mission, its main purposes to satisfy a burning desire for revenge, to boost morale in the war’s darkest days and to demonstrate that the nation’s resolve remained as strong as steel.
Friday, September 30: 5:30 pm-10:00 pm
Yeah, that’s right, I flirted, I teased and got a kiss as a reward!
For our experience as parents in the first two weeks I feel like I could write a novel on what we've learned and how parenthood is an emotional rollercoaster. We're hanging in there, through our sleep deprived haze, and are enjoying this little dude more and more than we ever thought possible.
Unfortunately, all did not go smoothly. It was a chilly windy morning, so the kids started whining about going home almost right away. I fussed at them to get out from under my feet and GO PLAY. I gave them the option of sitting at the end of the table where we were working or going back out to play. They chose to play. Whew, right?
Dunn was in Tokyo for a series of shows. News of his death was posted on the Facebook site of his friend and fellow musician Steve Cropper, who was on the same tour. Cropper said Dunn died in his sleep.
In order to gain financial independence and security, they’ll need to educate themselves about topics that normally haven’t been at the top of their minds.
Passover came, and Marc didn't buy any sippy cups to use during the holiday, when we swap out all of our usual dishes for the eight days. Max had been using "big boy cups" at school forever, but at home, he still loved his sippy cups. There were some tearful mornings, but by the end of the holiday, he'd gotten used to the new cups. And so I didn't bring back the sippy cups.
Love lights your simplest act, your every deed.
I'll also be supplying gum and mints to hopefully keep them awake!
You can find Cyrila’s Chocolate online at www.ecomayachocolate.com
To posterity, the sacred heritage of honor.
I had to hug one of my precious little man Watson goodbye.
In a total irrelevance to McCormack’s classic, Yam Laranas’ latest film The Road is now set to premiere in US cinemas today after it’s release in the Philippines last November 30, 2011. The movie plots itself with a 12 year old case that has been opened after three teenagers gone missing in the same stretch of road somewhere in the Philippines. It’s a story told in reverse, you get the final scenes first, and then you start to dig deeper on the past twenty years. While in the run, gruesome killings, secrets, and truth began to unveil itself.
The dt all have prizes on their blog which you can have a chance at winning by doing the blog hop. My prize is a $20 gift certificate to spend at My Favorite Things!! :)
5) Kozel (Czech) - Yummy Dark and Malty
11:30 AM and 3:00 PM
* Meet deadlines.
The Haunting is a masterfully constructed chiller that still retains its power to unsettle. The initially quiet, unassuming approach Wise utilises to create slow-burning tension eventually gives way to an all out, yet still credible and affecting, assault on the senses. A shining example of the ‘less is more’ approach to horror, and one to watch alone with the lights off…
It took me from October 2011 until December to read up, research and study what phone would suit my lifestyle. Various forums (Android Forums, Pinoy Android, XDA Developer), tech review sites (Engadget, Technorati, Pocket-lint, GSM Arena, T3, Ubergizmo, etc.) and YouTube reviews showcase this phone as the ultimate Android device for mobile gaming.
Our family has a full weekend planned....I will hopefully have some pictures to tell you all about it next week! Enjoy your weekend!
This is it straight out of the packet. It is quite boxy, and my modern instinct is to take it in at the waistline, but my vintage instinct is to keep to the authentic 60's silhouette - oh, what to do?!
The opening section of Imagine talks about Bob Dylan. How Dylan was on tour in the early stages of his career and hated it so much, he told his fans he was giving up music. He felt his songs were meaningless, that they no longer thrilled him in any way. He didn't like who he had become.
So I go in to work, 4 hours of meeting and then it's time for the team build! Oh yippee!
For practical purposes, I won't be establishing any joint accounts for my Love and I anytime soon. Then the US could claim her earning and assets (retirement accounts, etc.) are partially mine and tax us for their value.
INFERNAL DEVICES
Haste, haste, haste; God’s changing the church
Atlantic Yards ombudsman Forrest Taylor met a cordial but sometimes prickly audience last night at a meeting held by the Council of Brooklyn Neighborhoods (CBN), which has been significantly critical of the project and is a plaintiff challenging the Empire State Development Corporation’s (ESDC) environmental review of the project.
Nicolaus Copernicus wasn't the first to cook up this whole "heliocentric" theory (I hope there is no need of explaining it to you....hey, a man can dream), but he was the first one to publicly reveal it through his "De revolutionibus orbium coelestium" work that was published in 1543. This was an outrageous work, providing that it explicitly stated that the Earth is not in the centre of the Universe (or even our solar system, as a matter of fact), which cannot possibly be true. I mean, if you ask me, you have to be crazy to believe something like that. The Earth no longer being in the centre of the Universe? It can't be. We're special! God loves us (and by "us" I mean all the white christians, and only them). So the Church wasn't really convinced by his claims and (unlike before then, by which I mean the Middle Ages) kindly asked him to stop this. As you can see, no more tortures. Thank you Church, finally.
Astute readers of this blog o’ mine will have noticed something new along the extreme right hand sidebar – namely My Bad Adolescent Poetry. In 1970, at age 21, I had accrued enough cash to hand print up a few hundred copies of my poetry. The title of the collection was Prism Prisons – a god-awful yet appropriate name for the horny, angsty stuff it contained, which I’d written between the ages of 15 and 20.
More on the Stoke game tomorrow.
Saturday-30 minutes of vigorous cleaning (have I mentioned that I love that this can be counted as cardio?!)
For a short while
On the inside of my card I mounted white card stock and stamped my sentiment and my full image and colored it with my Copic Markers. I hope you enjoyed my card. Thanks for stopping and commenting, I hope to see you again soon. We hope everyone enjoys this weeks challenge! We look forward to seeing your wonderful creations and commenting on your beautiful cards. You have until 3PM on Friday May 11, 2012 to post your card. Remember if you use MFP a Heinrich Company stamps your name will be entered into the
We were seated for dinner, sharing a selection of dishes from each restaurant. When Malaysia Kitchen officially opens tonight, the public will receive three or four small savoury dishes, presented together on a tasting plate.
1 perspectives
How do I live the sinlessness of my prize adornment?
Eckhard Schnabel presented a paper on “Fads and Common Sense: Reading Acts in the First Century and Reading Acts Today.” He summarized seven different approaches to Acts, from the historical, literary, and narrative criticism, to the more radical approaches of feminism and post-colonialism. He rightly criticized any commentary on Acts that ignores historical issues, although it is possible that come criticism of recent Acts studies and overly interested in historical issues is well-taken. I would certainly categorize my self as overly-interested in the historical details (over against the literary and sociological approaches) and find the warning to attend more closely to Luke’s theology a challenge. Nevertheless, Schanbel’s conclusion is that no one method can fully unpack the book of Acts, a blending of any (or all?) of the methods is required. I was handicapped for this paper in that I did not get a copy of his bibliography which was distributed. There were a number of studies mentioned that I need to browse.
5. Unlimited vacation.
As with every recipe that I have tried and tested, you know that it has to be virtually fail proof, because I refuse to measure precisely.
In seven years past, which is tastier, a sword or the razor blade of falling leaf?
You are growing up so fast.
Today, there are 27 countries in the European Union. 27 countries unite themselves to be strong, to share products, history, culture, with the others. It's so great !! European Union is a big family that we need to develop and protect. The world suffered from the two World Wars, after the Second one, they realize how cruel people can be, and chose to unite to be sure that it will never happen again. Politics wanted to save their countries, their populations, and it's really important.
I cut my letters from cork paper and inked the edges with Distress walnut stain. Next I adhered the bottom Dusty Attic piece, that is the one stained green. Then I attached the two smaller photos. Next I added the white Dusty Attic chippie placing part of it over top the center photo, and part underneath the center photo. Next to the top photo I placed a piece of Dusty Attic chicken wire. I mean, afterall, you have to have chicken wire when you've got a fox on the loose!
Indeed, the commander thus exhorted his troops as follows: "There is no other way of moving! If until now you were used to moving along roads and sidewalks, forget it! From now on we all walk through walls!"
May 23, Anchorage, AK Taught by Sherrie Siemens
Let Your glory be above all the earth.
I still struggle with bringing it all together.
With lightning like reflexes I reached out and steadied her preventing her from falling. I slowed down and asked if she was okay.
I’m already confused when my Canadian blogging friends write about how the 20 degree temperature is so lovely. You crazy Canucks. That is cold. Well, it is if you use the Fahrenheit side of the thermometer. I will never be able to use Celsius when describing the weather. Why did we have two to begin with anyways?
That's what various acupuncture people have told me over the years.
Having more homework than hours in the day, but somehow getting it finished on time. And even getting good scores! That's a miracle if I've ever seen one, but I wouldn't have experienced it if I hadn't had a ridiculous amount homework.
I posted an informative opinion, in two parts, to the Anonymous commentator – firstly, because the person politely asked me to do so, and secondly, with the hope that it would generate some debate on the topic. However -- to date, I have not heard a single word from this individual – not even a polite “Thank You!”.
Here's the first sneak:
You are my eternity eternally love
Research says, when on dates, people tend to order things that are easier to pronounce. There is something to hacking up phlegm when trying to order food that may be a turnoff to some people.
8. Big City Man (Christiansen, Oberg) 3:46
“I think a lot of young evangelicals are going to feel politically homeless,” said Tim King, communications director for the social justice group Sojourners who himself fits the demographic.
This rose plant got put into the egress window this evening. The plant got eaten by something, and does not look very healthy, but it has survived in a pot for a number of years. Hopefully, it will come through this winter.
Except from Slyde.
Speakeasy Double Daddy -- good stuff
- I blended spinach leaves with 50 ml water, strained and measured out 65 g of spinach juice.
Here are my projects...
The other day, I pulled out Fire and Hemlock and reread it for the first time in years. And you know what I did when I got to the end? I flipped it back around and started reading it again.
Shortly before SMAP took off in Sydney, Collected Works Bookshop opened in Melbourne. Collected Works attempted not only to be a small press bookshop but also to distribute Australian and international small press publications. Although not directly related to SMAP it is possible to see Collected Works as port of a ‘small press push’ in the early to mid eight­ies. A push which, for a while, seemed as though it was going to force the literary establishment to take notice.
The kids like to eat pizza; what kid doesn't? For quick lunches during the week, the kids like their Costco Kirkland brand pizza which, to tell you the truth, is neither healthy NOR tasty!
- In the event of a major cyber attack, what could we expect? Department off Defense networks collapsing, oil refinery fires, lethal clouds of gas from chemical plants, the financial systems collapsing with no idea of who owns what, pipeliness of natural gas exploding, trains and subways derailed, a nationwide blackout. This is not science fiction scenarios. (Adapted from Richard Clark, former Senior Advisor of Cyber Security)
Cheers Seventh
I was on Facebook the other day when I saw something quite disturbing. A friend of mine (one of the “old boys” from the rugby club) had put a very disturbing status up:
I just bought a second hand notebook computer, a bargain in the Police lost property auction. It works fine, but the hard drive is decidedly trivial in capacity....
Then, she graciously interjects, "Well, I'm so sorry I haven't called earlier to see how you were doing." I'm all magnanimous, and I'm like, "Oh, no, that's fine. No big deal." She then continues, "See, I've been laid up because I had to have emergency gall bladder surgery."
Natalie clutched the old stuffed fish and held it just out of Lucy’s reach. “You want this? What do you say?”
from the bottom of my heart...
The process through which the DSO was dissolved bore all the hallmarks of closed, patronage politics, too. The initial decision to break up the unit was taken by Jacob Zuma and his inner circle. It was then passed as a resolution by approximately 4000 delegates at the ANC's national conference at Polokwane in December last year. After that the ANC in Parliament just went through the legal motions of implementing the Polokwane decision, taken by people who were unelected by, unrepresentative of, and unaccountable to the people of South Africa.
First of all I got my lovely husband to find his compass in the barn, and then persuaded him to draw me a 60 degree diamond template (or you could do this bit yourself unless, like me, you are very bad at angles etc...). As I said my diamond was 1 and a quarter inches long but I would suggest you make yours a bit bigger for a full sized quilt!
1146 **D-IX/17/1992. Book Review: Ralph Lerner, The Thinking Revolutionary: Principles and Politics in the New Republic (Ithaca: Cornell University Press, 1987). This book review was originally commissioned by Interpretation, which found that it could not use it. (Incorporated in Item C-1999(4), above, pp. 704-22.) See Item D-III/9/1990, above.
One of the more profound moments of the rally was when one of the speakers (who lost his sister to a hit-and-run driver 6 years ago) asked us to lay our bikes on the ground for a moment of silence in memory of those who have been killed.
Luckily I am cured of Alcohol and its mean ways, but that means I linger until 1.20am hearing retreating voices below – ‘time please ladies and gentlemen’ – ‘time please’ called for numerous hours and then snigger and laff out on bayed window space until I have a headache for lack of Alcohol to send me sleepward and then to be right royally rogered by First in their capacity not to get to said destination this morning on time…and cause the gills of hell to open be ready to leave me entrailedless in Truro behind its bowlless arse.
The Great Electric Show and Dance 1969 was the album that featured the song. Frankly I thought it went back a long way further and reality it probably did.
Mexican food with corn tortillas in stead of flour tortillas
But on Valentine’s Day, I had to make note of one holiday moment that occurred before the debate began.
Vintage photo I coloured in Photoshop. Background and gull Googled.
So already, I have been inspired a huge amount by this individual, because they have made a conscience decision to reach out to people with the true intention of benefiting other people’s lives. They signed off their letter as “A very little hero”, but I think they’re not giving themselves the credit they deserve, because in my opinion, this person is so much more than a very little hero, and everyone can use Sam as an example.
Still, giving them an excuse to help homophobes mess with a gay kid’s life doesn’t make it her fault that they did. The administrators are still accountable for the fact that they took that opportunity and used it to make the situation even worse by picking the victim of bullying to make an example of.
It was the second time this year that the unit has raided CJ’s, witnesses say. They said the first time police threw teargas into the club and then hit, slapped and kicked ¬patrons.
The man was known to authorities for having spent time in Afghanistan and Pakistan.
They believed that God would help them, but for now they were in bondage. They were slaves to the Persians still. They had to pay heavy taxes of money and produce, and perhaps even military service. The deliverance prophecies of Jeremiah were not for them. This caused them great distress, but it was in this state of affairs that they had a strong faith in God and sought after him, no matter what happened. Now, remembering the faithfulness of God previously in the covenants, they would write up a covenant that they might obey God.
He also rant at Singaporeans as if the entire nation has offended him:
I walk a fine line between "the need for plans & schedules" and "getting bored easily". I need to have a schedule and to make a plan, but I need to remake them all the time and always have a new one, so I don't get bored. I would be perfectly happy eating the same breakfast and wearing the same outfit every day, but there is no way I can stick to the same exercise routine or same earrings every day.
Cardigan- Modström
Castor has reluctantly returned to exorcism after the case of the Bonnington Archive ghost convinced him that he really can do some good with his abilities ('good', of course, being a relative term when dealing with the undead). But his friend, Rafi, is still possessed; the succubus, Ajulutsikael (Juliet to her friends), still technically has a contract on him; and he's still - let's not beat around the bush - dirt poor. Doing some consulting for the local constabulary helps pay the bills, but Castor needs a big, private job to really fill the hole in his overdraft. That's what he needs. What he gets, good fortune and Castor not being on speaking terms, is a seemingly insignificant 'missing ghost' case that inexorably drags himself and his loved ones into the middle of a horrific plot to raise one of Hell's fiercest demons. And when Satanists, sacrifice farms, stolen spirits and possessed churches all appear on the same police report, the name of
that won me from the start.
I let the stocking gifts fall through the cracks this year, and if WW hadn't been so prepared, there would have been none, so I need to do better on that!
American Exeperience has a movie called Surviving the Dust Bowl that is available online for free. It's an hour-long movie, but this clip is only about 8 minutes. They also have a Teacher's Guide, interviews, and much more!
To have my attention drawn to a salacious piece in a law blogger’s website, a website called Law Actually, by my asinine brother who wastes his days on Twitter, writing incomprehensible nonsense on here and getting drunk with lawyers in the capital City is bad enough; but to find that the Vice Chancellor of Buckingham University, an otherwise most sensible man by the name of Terence Kealey,vice-chancellor of that most esteemed establishment, and the author of Sex, Science and Profits (2008) has been giving intemperate advice, has made me most dyspeptic.
お次はSideshow Stampsらしいユニークで楽しいカードを作りたくて作って一枚☆
Aneesha Kohli – Genetics major – Imperial College, London, UK (World Rank – 6th)
I hope that when you discover a charming village, new restaurant, gorgeous hotel, unique shop, great-value wine or anything else worthwhile, you'll share the names with us. If you hear about an upcoming event that sounds like fun--an art show, concert, dance performance, truffle festival, whatever--please let me know so I can post it.
News-Antique.com, DALLAS, TX -- "When a truly exceptional copy of Detective Comics #27, the very first appearance of Batman, is auctioned by Heritage Auction Galleries in its Feb. 25 Signature® Comics & Comic Art Auction, it will set two important marks:
Phil is the author of Sixty Seconds: One Moment Changes Everything, a collection of 45 inspiring, life-changing stories from prominent people he interviewed, including Joan Borysenko, Deepak Chopra, geneticist Dr. Francis Collins, acclaimed sportswriter Frank Deford, Dr. Larry Dossey, Wayne Dyer, Dan Millman, Caroline Myss, Dr. Christiane Northrup, Dr. Dean Ornish, Dr. Rachel Naomi Remen, Dr. Bernie Siegel, James Van Praagh, singer Billy Vera, Doreen Virtue, Neale Donald Walsch, and bassist Victor Wooten.
Of all Lebanon’s communities the Dom, described by some researchers as “the Gypsies of Lebanon”, are the most marginalized: Up to 68 percent of Dom children do not attend school, according to a new report.
When her Nana smiles inside the flame, she knows it´s a lie, but she still sets her remaining matches on fire and reaches for the loving embrace they offer.
NO: 95 Democrats and 66 Republicans
I'm having the time of my life... but buuuuuuuuuuuusssssssssssssssyyyyyyyyyyyy!
Stay tuned: in the coming weeks I will need to write a letter to the Holy See and tell them what it looks like from here. I may need to toss the Catholics aside and start that spiritual journey anew.
I love weekends, especially when there is time for reflection and reading and journaling and praying. When there is time to sort through “soul laundry” – separating dark from light, dirty from clean, renovating, taking stock. Knowing what is going on inside, what the Lord is teaching me, what I am ignoring, what I am embracing. These are necessary disciplines.
Honey badger don’t care, and water buffalo don’t fall for your shady Varanasi scams. Oh, and stop dumping your dead goats in the river. Water buffalo is not amused.
Bon Jovi- Raise Your Hands
Yesterday was a big deadline for job applications (so no time to blog), both for vacation schemes and training contracts. Finding the time to do applications properly whilst during the LPC is challenging enough without them all coming at once. But they are done and dusted, and now its just waiting for the replies.
It’s a bit of a no-brainer, but in the face of a materialistic, consumerist culture, I’ve got to ask: is this all life is about? Years ago I found & bought this T-shirt which I wore for years (no it’s not me in the photo). For me, this more accurately represents where consumerism & materialism end up – no where. It represents what St Paul said to young Pastor Timothy nearly 2000 years ago when he said, “we brought nothing into the world, and we can take nothing out of it” (1 Tim 6:7). But then he goes on to say, “if we have food and clothing, we will be content with that” (v8). Can you imagine that – being content with what we have in life? Is it even possible in a culture that is always striving to create within us discontent with what we have – not just in material possessions, but with every aspect of life? For example, how many marriages have broken up because one partner hasn’t been content with the spouse God has given to him/her and has failed to acknowledge their own shortcomings in the relationship…
Stone Brewing Co. Special Holiday Ale - Jolly Pumpkin / Nøgne-Ø / Stone
They had some Homebrewed beer at the Whitehouse for the Superbowl made with some of the First Lady's honey (from bees). I'm thinking so what? Did they have wings as well?
Our game of Ultimate went well, and a bunch of us did lunch afterwards. It was a lovely sunny day, so I wandered around town after lunch and browsed through a few thrift stores and one consignment store.
Now on to my blog candy for this hop. For this hop I will be giving one lucky winner the "Encouraging Thoughts" stamp set from my wonderful sponsor Mary at Cardz TV Stamps.
After a long bout of silence, Naida spoke again. “I take it you’re not a Gelban, then.”
Final Note: I've found it interesting that so many of the blogs that have spoken of this picture talk about the prominent positions of a black man and two men in the room. While I think that it's great there is a little diversity in the room, we're still looking at a picture in 2011 of the president's situation room that has only one racial minority, and two women out of fourteen inhabitants (or at least pictured inhabitants). The ration of male to female in this country is nearly 1 to 1, and minorities in this country make up nearly 30% of the population. Why aren't those same ratio's being seen in these important decision-making rooms?
"We all do. But it isn't always possible."
But there is even more to do in the summer, including some activities you simply cannot experience at any other time. Considering how beautiful the region is in winter, and how hot it is in summer, few people think of it as summer destination. They should, and the folks at the unique Zamas resort in Tulum are out to change some minds
Earlier this year in the President’s State of the Union address, Obama alluded to his proposal that over the next 10 years would essentially free-up 500MHz of wireless spectrum via incentive auctions which would encourage innovation, and construct a nationwide interoperable wireless network for public safety while slashing the national deficit by roughly $10 billion.
As the brand and business grow, it’s critical to continually ensure your carefully crafted brand positioning is embodied and communicated in everything your brand does and says – even (or especially) if you don’t have much of a media budget. Whether it’s the innovative product with a unique package and graphics, motivating online or in-store promotional materials, systems and processes, or consumer services scripts, each element can work to build the brand…or detract from it.
It's of my mom's crown capper we were talking about. This is what I watched her do year after year as far back as I can remember.
The private investigator or, in Sherlock Holmes’ case, ‘consulting’ detective, is a figure completely embedded into the history of the crime and mystery genre, but one with many faces and attributes. Many of the best known sleuths after all were not in fact police officers but men (and occasionally women) working in an unofficial capacity, acting instead of, in competition with or in parallel to, the official forces of law and order. This is certainly true of such well-connected amateurs as Lord Peter Wimsey and Miss Marple for instance but we would probably hesitate to actually call them ‘private detectives’ as there is something semi-official about that phrase, connoting a professional activity which we would instead connect more directly with the likes of VI Warchavski, Poirot, Nero Wolfe and Philip Marlowe rather than just a hobby for an inquisitive amateur sleuth.
This is not black advocacy or empowerment. It is demeaning, humiliating, and crippling. Why can't my fellow blacks see this obvious truth?
“Their very importance makes them seem charming people, and they are celebrated all the time: they seem to live a sort of gay, high life, and others, by curiously watching them live it, celebrate them as well as their celebrated way of life” – C. Wright Mills
Here's the full kit
I was also intrigued when the author confirmed my personal beliefs that the “Yellow” races owes its origin to "a very early blend" of Cain's race with a black race, and that this proposition is in accordance with Ethnological doctrines. This explains why the Chinese have always assisted Africa – (for they are brothers), and why nothing good can ever come from The East.
So, maybe thirteen (and a half) miles in 2013? Seems there’s a rumor that next year the race will move to Martin Luther King Day weekend, which would make the next race January 20, 2013. I get that holiday off, so that would work for me.
I could have done without some of Isaac’s complaining, I appreciate honesty in a documentary, but I always think of people that go that far in life as resilient and having a take no prisoners kind of attitude, which he luckily showed when he wanted to have the girls be seen through a screen while getting dressed, brilliant!
Tap dancing on a land mine
And this is Satchmo! And his owner is Paula West. And since we were organized back-stage by last name . . . Satchmo and Redford spent the entire evening playing . . . while we tried desperately to keep them from damaging their outfits . . . lol.
Clearly, there’s a lot more thought needed and work to be done before this becomes a reality but at the moment the industry is running hard just to keep up. Even if it does not increase the numbers, if nothing else, improved training at entry and mid-level will increase the productivity of those who remain, thus part of the capacity and resource challenge will be resolved.
101. Lay really like to talk ‘Yes, of course.’
i have been wanting to build a wooden toy box for my grandbaby for quite awhile now. her toys have been piled up in the corner of my livingroom for months, yuck. so i thought about what style of box i wanted... i didn't want something plastic or press wood. i decided on using pallet wood...just because i love pallet wood!
Inmates held on immigration detainers were one of the few countervailing trends: ICE detainers accounted for 3.3% of local jail inmates in 2011 nationwide, compared to 1.7% in 2005 (the 21st century floor).
Ok. There. Whatevs. Moving on. End of interruption.
"Ah, hence the name"
2) Get a microphone if you want viewers to hear people who are more than 3 feet from the computer
To drop down in them and sleep.
The budget The daily list of every story planned for the day’s paper, which may change as the news does, delineating how much space each will get
In a large bowl, combine the first 6 ingredients. Crumble the beef over the mixture and mix well. Shape into a round loaf; place in the crockpot. Cover and cook on low for about 6 hours. In a small mixing bowl, combine the ketchup, brown sugar, and worcestershire sauce. Gently pour it over the meat loaf. Cook for about 15 minutes or until heated through. Let stand for about 15 - 20 minutes before cutting. Serve with some garlic mashed potatoes and your favorite vegetable, and your family will think it was the best meatloaf ever.
Do you ever start crafting and 3 hours later you haven't actually achieved anything? Well this is me this week, suffering from Crafters Block. I have had no inspiration at all and with a long list of to do's I really need my brain to function. I can also do with a cleaner but I guess that isn't going to happen either, lol. It has taken me a couple of days to come up with my card for today and I have kept inside very plain for me.
Surely, the widespread perception of anomie and disorder contributed to a climate conducive to crime, but broken windows were a symptom of poverty, not its cause. They were a sign of the abandonment of the projects’ residents by the city, and by an economy that either could not provide jobs—as factories closed and the middle class fled to the government-subsidized suburbs—or simply could not provide employment at a wage that could pay the rent necessary for decent housing.
I still left feeling like I have potential…..but I was seriously doubting that I could follow through with my plans of doing hot yoga 7 days straight with my friend Inna at the end of January.
matching chintz drapes and spread...
While the motivating factors and intentions of the ANC Youth League that is driving and spearheading the revolution maybe good and solid, the problem lies with the opportunistic undisciplined rebel elements.
The mom of the little girl looked at me, afraid that I'd actually let Brooklyn run over there and bug her daughter. And I could just see her thinking the words, "Does your daughter ever shut up?"
In a state of Emergency it is the Government's role and duty to create jobs, just like it is the Government's job to tax and police it borders. We are in a state of Emergency now. The country's unemployment rate is at 11%.
Just this week, an acquaintance of mine passed away due to complications from his long-running battle against multiple myeloma. He was treated at the same out-of-state myeloma clinic at which I was treated. We occasionally ran into each other at the local cancer center where we both received maintenance chemotherapy.
Haven’t we heard people say, ‘there’s no such thing as a free lunch’ ? If there is a place where this cliche doesn’t apply, it is Dharmasthala; it’s not just the lunch that’s free here. Our taxi driver who has been here before spoke of free accommodation for pilgrims. But then he took Rs.50 from me as parking fee at the car park in front of the Manjunath Dharmasthala temple. I wonder who runs this parking lot.
They were right of course, so I chose soft maple instead.
But I never told you
getting
Soon they'll be bearded and mustachioed.
Syria prohibited Jews from working in agriculture in February 1950.
Well I really was the early bird that caught the worm at the charity shops on Monday morning. Since New Year, I've really got the denim bug and I certainly bagged the best bargains of the year so far.
Reviewer: Jessica M
1. Exercise Daily
The first level of disappointment came for fans when Head Administrator (pun intended?) Eve Torres made it known that Beth Phoenix was not medically cleared to wrestle (something that our very own Mr. Quinn Gammon knew via text message from the WWE forty minutes prior to that actual conversation taking place).
I am coming to think however, that to 'get organized' is not really the destination. I am beginning to wonder if it isn't more of a never ending path/journey. Where each day we make the choice of doing something that helps us accomplish our other goals or not.
James went back to BC for the rest of the summer, he is working at another camp this week & I am excited to see what God does next!!
The House of Representatives is taking a different approach about the government employee pension plan compared to the approach taken by Governor Bobby Jindal. You have said that you felt the pension issue is the most difficult before the legislature this year. With the House, the more conservative body in the legislature, how do you think the Governor will handle this issue while maintaining his conservative credentials?
This afternoon I had a 20 something women approach me and sheepishly ask if I could measure her "pupil distance," as her eye doctor wouldn't do it for her.
Has anyone seen “The Human Centipede?”
But i did get what's hopefully an even better shiba picture than the one in this post, and one good shiba picture is worth a thousand sunset or food pictures, in my opinion!
RepairPal 2.0 Mobile is a new app that tries to make car maintenance and repairs as simple and painless as possible. Also, It could save you money! The new app helps you:
But it is still a good shot because not only does it show Civil War soldiers in live action, it also shows the place where the Union army made a secret crossing up the stream of Bull Run. A 'run' is a word used around that area for a strong creek, just short of being called a river, and that's what Bull Run is.
The juxtaposition of cultures is marked in the Northwest region of the District where I reside. The forces of gentrification and urban renewal have combined to create a cityscape peopled by the most diverse of populations, resulting in a potpourri of ethnicities, colors, ages and inclinations as my sojourns down the “U Street Corridor” attest to on a daily basis. The Dharma, or truth, of these intertwined “realities” can be stark on the surface as individuals from totally different cultural backgrounds mix, meld and merge within the context of a smart “urbanicity” that marks the District as unique as the children of privilege rub elbows with the sons and daughters of the diaspora, as well as the descendants of the enslaved.
Confessions of a Psychotic Housewife : I am the Psychotic Housewife - a gothic Martha Stewart, SAHM, addicted to shopping and saving money while living in a Murphy's Law zone where everything that can go wrong, will go wrong. I'm prepared to survive the zombie apocalypse - are you?
Poetry: Have you read A Man’s Search for Meaning? It’s by Viktor Frankl. It isn’t poetry, but when I’ve had an awful day I tend to remind myself of Viktor. He lived through the concentration camps of WWII and managed to keep his faith in God. The book talks about how to go on even when going on is really the last thing you’d like to do. It’s kind of become my unofficial motto. More famously put, “when you are going through hell, keep going” (so apt for moving day)
The One X stands at 134.4 x 69.9, while the Galaxy S III is just a bit bigger at 136.6 x 70.6mm. Of course, the S III’s slightly larger screen accounts for the difference.
If you make anything using my template or tutorials, I'd love to see! Please leave a comment and let me know. Take care and belated happy Halloween!
Could it be that you and me are the lucky ones
- Lord (Jehovah, or Yahweh)
Mandy Wiener walked alone into a room filled with gangsters. These were brothers in blood, men who would not sell each other out for love or money. But she had an agreement with them. They could see her manuscript about the murder of mining magnate Brett Kebble if they told her everything they knew about what happened, and everything about themselves.... more here
To the delirious eye, more lovely things
Did I really spend money on cards and neglect my Roth IRA? I have to think about that one...
There are important lessons for Yann to learn from this experience, nonetheless. If you are paying strange women to have sex with you, it is prudent to call a taxi after they have rendered their service, rather than falling asleep and trusting them to make an honourable exit. Hopefully, he’ll take such precautions habitually when he’s an experienced whoremonger. It is possible, of course, that he wanted the girls to lie beside him for company’s sake. Sleeping alone in a kingsize bed might be a lonely experience for a footballer who’s just been fellated. If so, he should have handcuffed the girls to the bed until daybreak. Enjoying a life of wanton debauchery means taking appropriate safeguards.
Maybe it is because my mother always said that there is enough love in one mother for many children, I love each craft fully and differently but each with my whole heart, although as my aunt has been known to say sometimes, I love them but they make it very hard for me to like them.
I have long thought and mentioned a few times that Spooks' old boy doesn't travel the best. I spent a lot of time with him last year working to improve the way he moves, but in all reality I had minimal success. I didn't put a huge amount of thought into it...Sometimes you just have to use them the way they are.
You’ll have access to Disney Agent Rate specials (when offered) for your own travel
Thought for the Day
(Options) Sprinkle of instant oatmeal & pinch of chopped pecan or walnut
Well, this is it for me for today. Thanks so much for stopping by, I love hearing from you all!
I really, truly am.”
So mini monkey wants a mini baby but he doesn’t know which one of the 4 females to pick. Mary? Lisa? Linda? or Sandra?
Then, to ensure personal and nationwide prosperity, top level salary must be linked to bottom level salary. This could be any figure, but if we use a multiplier of 10, this would mean that a director who wants to pay himself £1,000,000 would have to pay his most junior administrator £100,000. In reality of course the director probably would just lower their salary, but it would make for a significantly fairer economy.
No, not combatants—only
After high school, Fabry attended and graduated from the W. Page Pitt School of Journalism at Marshall University in Huntington, WV. After graduation, Fabry and his wife felt a desire for biblical education, so his pastor suggested they check out Moody Bible Institute in Chicago. At Moody, Fabry met Jerry Jenkins who learned of his desire to write and encouraged him to pursue his dream. In 1998, Jenkins and Dr. Tim LaHaye hired him to write Left Behind: The Kids series. He wrote 35 books in that series over the next six years. He later collaborated with Jenkins on the Red Rock Mysteries series and The Wormling series, and in 2008 he worked solo on the NASCAR-based RPM series.
I know endless shrimp is unsustainable and morally suspect, but as Sting once sang, when the world is running down, order more scampi.
Used the packaging from the hand wipes at the restaurant for a tag pouch (again... lol).
The embarrassing first experience did not scare Tatiana off. She developed quite a taste for vagina fitness, and now she has her exercising balls custom-made.
8. Bake for 1 hour, or until a toothpick inserted in the center of the cake comes out clean. Cool on a rack in the pan for 30 minutes then carefully remove from the pan and transfer the cake to a serving plate, crumb side up.
This just so happened to be before we decided to go to Boston. At the time we were thinking of becoming old people and going on a beach vacation where we’d be far away from any semblance of culture: Myrtle Beach, South Carolina. My parents took us there when I was a child every year and I loved it. I put forth this idea because I guess I wanted to rediscover my childhood down there. At least that’s what I was thinking at the time. The genesis of the idea came when I got back to work after a boring vacation where I did nothing and had fallen into a sort of vacation depression. I immediately started planning my next vacation. Somehow I got stuck on this idea of going to Myrtle Beach. I was in the tail end of feeling overstressed at work to the point that I felt nauseous often and would get tingly sensations in my chest. I think my aim was to go somewhere where we would not have to do anything, we could go to the beach and just sit there with a blank mind. I assume this is why I was stuck on the idea anyway, as I said, I don’t really remember.
All true, of course. But what many accounts leave out is the staggering level of technological advance since 1980. (Advances which ultimately wouldn’t exist without public funding/infrastructure). This enormous technological component of productivity doesn’t translate into wages for human labour, hence the necessity of solutions such as a Citizen’s Income.
Yes, those are paint bottles at the bottom right. They're a mix of non-toxic Crayola paint and baby shampoo for finger painting in the bathtub.
You have probably heard the term ‘nature vs nurture’ countless time. But ever thought what does it really mean…
In public, at least. I don’t know about other leaders, but sometimes when I’m all alone, I begin crying for every reason and for no reason at once.
and you didn't reach it.
Below the tree on textured hills, we see the rabbit racing along, ever hurrying in his desire to not be late! The copper embossed rabbit echoes the wonderful warm color scheme of the page. What a perfect stamp for this scene! Ky has combed hills out of modeling paste, building up layers of color with multiple applications and distress ink and homemade glimmer mist for color. What fabulous texture! It adds such a tactile element to the page.
Mix all your ingredients, apart from the flour and butter, together. Add 90% of the flour and start kneading. After a couple of minutes add the butter and remaining flour. Keep kneading for 10 minutes adding small bit of flour if the dough is too sticky, but avoid making it too hard.
Vitamin B3. Also known as niacin, this vitamin is important for many digestive tract functions, including the breakdown of carbohydrates, fats, and alcohol. Not getting enough niacin can result in a disease known as pellagra, which causes severe vomiting and diarrhea.
surfboards spit out
it in actual reality!…then in good speed u will have that which youu
And left poor maggie scarce a stump.
Nearly all of the 10,893 spent fuel assemblies at the Fukushima Daiichi plant sit in pools vulnerable to future earthquakes, with roughly 85 times more long-lived radioactivity than released at Chernobyl.
Add sour cream and diced browned onions to the skillet with mushrooms, cover it and braise 10-15 minutes. Add finely chopped dill or parsley leaves, mix and let cool.
I stroke her lightly, memorizing her body. I want her to melt into me, like butter on toast. I want to absorb her and walk around for the rest of my days with her encased in my skin. I lie motionless, savoring the feeling of her body against mine. I'm afraid to breathe in case I break the spell."
G crochet hook
The formula is perfect and covers great in just 2 coats!
2. Mead. How could I mention Tej without talking about mead? When I tried a Danish hibiscus and hops mead called Viking Blod at the Scandinavian/Dutch bar Vandaag a year ago ($9 a glass), I was blown away. It’s 19% alcohol, sweet, but boozy. It has rich, floral and apple notes on top of the distinct taste of honey. It’s amazing. Despite its sweetness, I don’t think of it in the same terms as a dessert wine, though it could serve as such. A bottle, if you can find it, runs about $30. Vandaag, for one, carries four different meads on its menu.
I digress....this man Swigga released a statement with this jam that illustrates just what he and Scram were trying to do and why we're getting this goodness:
Just my desktop.
Stopped by the local flower stand (actually, this is at the local health food store), and the display of flowers was amazing... how do you just pick one? Do you go with what looks best? Do you go with color? Or white? Do you buy one of each, and no groceries...?
But more intervention was needed. So last Friday I sprung her from school at lunchtime. Curt and I took her to lunch (Red Robin-- yum!) and talked to her about her plans. Then I took her shopping because she needed some spring clothes and it was a good time to do a little retail therapy. And when it was all said and done, she was a little happier, her step a little lighter. Did we solve all her problems? No. Of course not. But I think at the end of the day, she knows that we're here for her.
Wash the cucumbers, cut off the ends, and slice into thick wedges.
I cut a large flower shape with my cricut for the bottom portion of the sketch and used the lovely textile print in brown. Then I outlined the flower with Manderine twine from the Twinery. I quilled a camera because I really wanted one on there and I decided that it would be fun to try my hand at it. The rest of the embellishments are October Afternoon from various lines: Sidewalks, 5 & dime, Sarsaparilla and the flour pack from Farmhouse. I really mixed it up. The little pin flags are Girls Paperie.
Sometimes I wish I could clone myself and have several of me to do all the many many jobs that require my everyday undivided attention!
These can be framed with West Elm's 14x17 gallery frames, which I would love in white.
Lord help us all.
We are developing relationships with these systems in the sense that they are friends. We can choose to sample all of them, but not get the full experience of any. Or we can choose to sample none and be disconnected from a large portion of the actual human population. Who will be our pen pals tomorrow? And we have even begun to label these massive multinational global entities called companies as people. Perhaps it is because some of them have become so big that we are unsure of exactly what to do with them, or how to categorize them.
*) Assistant Chief Constable Sharon Rowe, a couple of weeks ago, abased herself in front of foaming and screaming Muslims at the recent anti-CCTV ‘rally’ in Birmingham. Then last Saturday, that very same woman was in charge of a policy which systematically allowed non-Muslims to be attacked by rioting Muslims – hands-off, eh? The West Mids Police deliberately let the EDL out in dribs and drabs so that the Muslims could 'sort them out’. That’s exactly what happened. That’s why Sharon Rowe also stopped up to a thousand EDL from going to the demo in Dudley. They were held captive in Tipton. And that included the many, many stewards who would have stopped any EDL trouble in Dudley in the first place!. But Sharon Rowe and the WMP wanted trouble! Why? So they can ban the EDL in the future. So they can say: Look. I told you say. The EDL cannot be trusted.
called me last spring to ask if i would take pictures for their 4th and 5th birthday party this fall. i had actually been meaning to call her to tell her that she needed to have a "tea party" birthday party for them this year. i had seen so many beautiful things on pinterest and thought that they were the perfect age for one. we almost said it at the same time because that was just what she wanted to do. she wasn't sure just how she was going to do it, though.
Well...I created it using just two of the stamps from the Papertrey Ink stamp set, Modern Basics! One is the cluster of three solid shapes (used for the two points of the heart), and the other is just one solid shape, that I easily rotated to fill in the curved left and right sides of the heart.
“I was driving along, going through the valley, enjoying this beautiful summer afternoon, and the weirdest thing happened when I got to your drive. I’ve held my driving licence for over forty years, but I was compelled to come up your drive, and I’m absolutely convinced that if I’d taken my hands off the wheel, it would’ve just turned and the car would’ve found its way up here…”
Lovelies, what's your favourite cookbook? As promised this morning here are ten on mine that I love browsing through and getting inspired by. If you fancy dirty pots, I highly recommend getting any of them.
Tsingtao distinguishes itself from the pack. This beer has a nice, upfront malt presence which melds nicely with an assertive, slightly spicy hop bittering. The carbonation level is high and, as with all lagers, this is much better drunk on the cold side. It goes extremely well with Chinese food and is readily available here in the U.S. as well. While I would probably never actually buy a six-pack of it here, I frequently order one in a Chinese restaurant. Tsingtao is available in both a regular and "draft" version. In Shanghai, at least, the draft version costs twice as much and is inferior, to my taste, so I stuck with the regular. The beer that I would really like to try but never saw there is Tsingtao Dark Beer. The next time I go back I'm going to keep my eyes peeled and perhaps even ask around for that one.
1. Love and Intimacy: meaningful relationships, including friendships; loving and being beloved. We know these ties improve not only longevity but also the quality of life. How do these ties develop? Given the great emphasis on individuality and competitiveness in the way we rear children, how can we do a better job inculcating relational skills?
#Yolk
“For our conversation is in heaven; from whence we also look for the Saviour, the Lord Jesus Christ who shall change our vile body, that it may be fashioned like unto his glorious body. . .”
So, consider this a plea for understanding and a sincere apology for letting this blog sink down on my to-do list. I never want it to seem like I’m upset about my life, because I know that I am lucky to have a job, an (almost) college education, and the amazing, if unconventional, family that I have. Right now, I’m just a little overwhelmed with the responsibility that comes along with those privileges.
(4) In a transformer, K = 0.8, the mutual inductance = 10 H, the no. of primary and secondary turns are 50 and 200. Obtain the value of the primary current to produce 0.5Wb flux to link with the secondary coil. Also, calculate the value of secondary current.
I Thought Maybe A Pin Back Might Be Nice, & Attach To A Purse Or T Shirt?
So many people say don't shoot into the light, but put people in front of the light and let it come through their hair. Think about moving yourself through the scene to figure out where it's reflecting best and where you can see the colors and the details and more. One of the most important things you can learn in photography is learning how you can use the light. Use to your advantage whatever light you have. Windows are awesome for this because they frequently aren't harsh light.
Saturday: Group 3 & Group 4 extra work, no team WOD.
That's all I've got for now, time to go unpack some more boxes! Also, don't judge me; I couldn't pick which 5 month pictures I liked the best...so I included all of them, there's 13, haha :)
The performances are still admirable in this movie, but most of the people didn’t have a lot of emotional legwork to do. Sylvester Stallone has a pretty good emotional bit in the movie when he was talking to Mickey about needing to at least be around boxing. It was real and it was well done, but mostly Stallone kept up the same act of talking way too much and getting on my nerves. I don’t know why he felt the need to narrate everything he did in the movie, but he did. Like during the wedding scene when it was time to kiss the bride and he had to say, “Let me lift up your veil here,” or something like that. This made it easier for me to not watch the screen and still know what was happening, but I feel like the general majority of the audience is actually watching. Talia Shire and Burgess Meredith were still both great in the movie, but they each only had like one emotional scene, so they didn’t impress as much.
2007, Seabass recorded an emphatic victory at Horse & Jockey, Co Tipperary, the following month. He faded to ninth on his debut under Rules eight days later in a Gowran Park bumper and finished 13th on his hurdling bow at the Punchestown Festival in April, 2007. Seabass suffered a setback shortly after that effort and he returned to action 18 months later, when he was pitched against seasoned opposition for his chase debut in the Grade Three Poplar Square Chase at Naas in October, 2008, in which he finished fourth. He made just one more appearance in the 2008/2009, tailing off in a beginners’ chase at Naas and returned to the same course to take fifth in a novices’ handicap chase in December, 2009. Seabass was placed in handicap chases at Clonmel and Thurles on his next two starts and would have broken his duck over fences in another handicap chase at Navan in January, 2010, only to fall at the final fence when leading the field. He made amends at Punchestown four days later, gamely beating Stewarts House in a handicap chase, and followed up with another gritty success in a novices’ handicap chase at Fairyhouse in February, 2010. A further lengthy spell on the sidelines followed but Seabass made a winning return to action with a comfortable victory in a point-to-point at Ballinaboola on November 20, 2011. He continued his winning run with a pair of handicap chase wins at Punchestown on December 11 and at Limerick on December 27, before an impressive all-the-way success in a valuable handicap chase at Leopardstown on January 28. Seabass stretched his winning sequence to seven (six under Rules) with a game length verdict over Zaarito in the Grade Two Paddypower.com Chase at Naas on February 26, a victory that sees him 3lb “well in” for the John Smith’s Grand National, according to British Horseracing Authority head of handicapping Phil Smith.
Uppinder smiles at me. His choppers are so white and small they’re like stars themselves. “See? That’s what makes us better than the others, Sull. We CFCs, we really live. We’re real, actual humans, like from the old days.”
She is making up mini Swag Bags for our friends (very mini she said, muttering something about the economy). We only know economy has the word NOM in it and now we’re hungry…
left me hanging
"How Can I Be Sure" by The Young Rascals
URBANA – A downtown Urbana bar was robbed at gunpoint Thursday night.
* New training – can’t remember all the steps and the questions
My first thought, after ‘oooo I look nice!’ was ‘hot damn, this would look great on my friend Amy’. Then I thought how great it would look on Susan, and Sarah, and Catherine, and Kirsty, and Lydia, and Andrea, and Trini and Maddy and Eleanor and Victoria and Kat and Fi and my sister and my mother and my agent and oh my God pretty much every woman I know.
Eddie and I had the privilege of being in Hawaii with his mom and dad about a decade ago. Ed’s mom really loved the snorkeling- spending hours in the ocean going out quite a distance. Well… we were in a souvenir shop when we saw on a coffee mug that Bonnie’s name in Hawaiian was “Poni.” Neno nicknamed her “Snorki-Poni” … which brought a contagious giggle to all of us over the next few years.
I covet Blackberries. Especially those held by 22-year-old Capitol Hill interns deserving a beatdown.
over to the house to watch the Packer game!
Remember Sundays are YOP updates and Monday there will be an update from stitching. The giveaway on last weeks cloths is still open until Saturday when we shall draw out a lucky name from the hat so you still have time to enter HERE
My next finds—a small milk glass candlestick, a 1960s glass flowerpot, and a Japanese vase (marked Japan on bottom)—were at the $1 bargain table. Truth be told, I don't think milk glass is worth a lot these days but I'm sure an antiques shop would charge more than a dollar for this Imperial candlestick made in the 60s. I plan to use it as a pincushion base!
“So? Flowers? What do they have to do with anything?”
So, finally, after all that, here is my question:
NYC Exhibition Opportunity for Artists.
I focused our meals around lean protein and an assortment of fresh vegetables. I minimized carbs and switched to whole grain whenever possible. I completely cut out salt and soda. I have a sweet tooth and every afternoon, it ached. Sometimes I fulfilled it with fruit, and other times, I gave in to chocolate. The most important lesson I learned was balance and moderation. One aspect I had to balance was the checkbook. Undeniably, eating fresh and healthy IS more expensive when you're feeding a family of four. In the long run, it's a great investment, but still a challenge of current money and time to keep fresh foods in the house.
a bitter seed coat, crowing
And so 10 years after first sinking my shovel into the dirt, I sat in that garden and told it, admitted to it that I needed a break. That I needed to spread my wings. That I needed to explore Amy beyond Amy With The Beautiful Garden. I'm pretty sure I heard the garden say she'd be fine with a break, too. With that, off to Paris I went. Then I went again. Then I went to Ireland. Then I went to the south of France. Then I went to Paris one more time. All these trips in two years. I've come home to a garden that's a disaster.
Be gentle my sweet, handle with care. For my strength can be broken and my charity lost.
my parents (+ Emma, the best dog ever ).
pretending to do classwork when the teacher walks by, but actually not doing any schoolwork at all
In a letter to The Financial Times (April 19, 2012), Mr. Moen Qureshi, former Prime Minister of Pakistan and former Senior Vice President of the World Bank, expresses his annoyance with this new assertion of American ‘old boy’ privileges in staffing the top positions in world order. He does not offer
Kelly for Book Lover's Hideaway
1 “And now, O Israel, give heed to the statutes and the ordinances which I teach you, and do them; that you may live, and go in and take possession of the land which the LORD, the God of your fathers, gives you. 5 Behold, I have taught you statutes and ordinances, as the LORD my God commanded me, that you should do them in the land which you are entering to take possession of it. 6 Keep them and do them; for that will be your wisdom and your understanding in the sight of the peoples, who, when they hear all these statutes, will say, `Surely this great nation is a wise and understanding people.’ 7 For what great nation is there that has a god so near to it as the LORD our God is to us, whenever we call upon him? 8 And what great nation is there, that has statutes and ordinances so righteous as all this law which I set before you this day? 9 “Only take heed, and keep your soul diligently, lest you forget the things which your eyes have seen, and lest they depart from your heart all the days of your life; make them known to your children and your children’s children
"Gaming the USPTO" by bad actors using the system to intentionally obstruct otherwise valid applications; and
We've all done it. We've all, at one point or another, jumped on the bangs bandwagon. Bangs can be so amazing- some sexy, some chic, some cute- so its understandable why we all went there. I mean, who DOESN'T want to look like Zooey Deschanel. Le sigh.
And this one:
If you live in a common interest community such as a condominium association or homeowners association, chances are you have met an Architect of Division – AD for short.
-I would like to pretend that I am the responsible parent and get Lucy tested for any pet (dog/cat) allergies before she asks Santa for a kitten because he may or may not oblige her by bringing a furry friend this year!
smiling. He said he was on his way
THE TREATMENT
The sight of your eyes
As these thoughts developed, I realized that the one year anniversary of my mother’s passing is just a few months away. The thought almost took my breath away. Literally. Like a flood, the memories of my mom rushed through my head. I was left with an indescribable realization of her impact in my life. It sounds strange admitting this now, but it was at that moment that I decided to dedicate my training for the upcoming marathon in her memory. I became so caught up in the thought that I completely forgot my first group of thoughts and ran the next three miles about 45 seconds per mile faster than I planned.
-Cuello scored a knockdown 40 seconds into the fight and was credited with another in the first round. He should have had about four, but at least two that were legit knockdowns were ruled slips. Cuello finishes the fight in the second round when the referee stops the fight 56 seconds into the round.
Can you tell I just love this collection?... I bought the Forever Friends Black and Gold CD ROM from Create and Craft when Docrafts first released it on the older (rubbish) version of their software - it just would not upload on my laptop so I took all the artwork off instead and filed it on my own hard drive and printed papers and such out using Microsoft Publisher or MCS. Some of the content I couldn't access because of the file type but the main images, papers, embellishments were accessible so that was good enough at the time. However, when I bought the DVD ROM - Woodland Folk etc which included Tulip and Hot Digity Dog amongst others, they included a free version of Black and Gold which had been updated to load on the new version of the Digital Designer software so I can access everything, plus can now manipulate it and do more stuff with it - 'winner'!
When I look at Paris in black and white it is as if all her features jump out... the architectural elements of the buildings look sharper... the boulevards appear longer and wider... Details that I never normally notice or pay attention to appear larger and brighter...
So we’re in the thick of it. Holiday parties, work celebrations, family gatherings and whole lotta food! Everywhere. You can’t swing your party dress without hitting a tray of canapés. In between social events I can hear you complaining about your extraordinary eggnog intake and uncontrollable cookie consumption, sprawled out on the sofa like an overfed cat. So how about something a little lighter, no? I felt it was time to bring a little sanity – however, delicious sanity – to the table today.
“The Caton Team are the best. They are very easy to work with and know what they are doing. Made a very stressful time much easier! I would recommend them to all. First time buyers and people that have sold many times will enjoy working with these wonderful ladies!”
On Sundays, we often head to three markets in East London: Spitalfields, Brick Lane, and Columbia Road Flower Market. Spitalfields is great for clothing, vintage, handcrafted items, and food. I've posted about it before, so you can read more here.
Now, I shall pull myself together and tell you about all the fabulous things we have been doing lately, well I would, but clearly living such a reclusive life recently, we haven't been anywhere or done anything! So I shall bore you to death with all the mundane then!
It's all part of being a driver, but with all the sleuthing and figuring out human nature, I sometimes I think I should start a private detective agency.
Ozzy Osbourne – “Godfather of Heavy Metal” and the “Prince of Darkness”
To understand how Lotus can hurt your knee, visualize lifting your right foot up and placing it atop your left thigh. To get into this pose safely, your thigh will have to rotate outward about 115 degrees. For many of us, though, the thigh cannot turn out that much, either because of its bone structure or because tight muscles and ligaments inhibit its movement. If your thigh stops rotating but you keep lifting the shin and foot, you'll bend the knee joint sideways, which will pinch the inner-knee bones together—the upper inner end of the shin-bone pressing against the lower inner end of the thighbone. Between these bones lies the medial meniscus, which is a protective rim of cartilage that pads the knee joint and guides its movement. When you lift your foot, you are using your same-side shinbone as a long lever. If the thighbone doesn't rotate enough, you'll apply tremendous pinching pressure to the meniscus—as if your shinbone and thighbone were a giant pair of pliers. Forcing this lift even moderately can do serious damage. Similarly, if you are in Lotus and your top knee is not on the floor, pushing that knee downward can apply enormous damaging force to the meniscus.
Well, I must be getting bolder because recently I really seem to like taking on games that have my most hated elements right at the heart of their game play. Unlike Portal and Portal 2 however, Trine 2 doesn’t just have puzzles, it also has jumping. If it weren’t for the graphics, the chances of me not touching this game would have been 100%.
The main event today is a release blog hop so to get started in the excitement, the first stop on the hop is the inspirational ANN!
For the middle of the body, I tooke a light weight frame that had some depth ( like a shadowbox) and black back drop, and added gears made of wood and foam, some tinker toy pieces, a fake clock, and some wire.
person I enjoy so much but neglected for a little while.
‘MAGICAL DAY’
For the past month or so, our family has been looking forward to spending some time on the river. My husband and I both grew up camping and swimming there, and now our kids love it, too. Unfortunately, when vacation time rolled around, the river was out of its banks - flooded - and no good for fun.
offering another one for you today!
And to top it all, two acting magistrates, one from Brits and one from Garankuwa were arrested for armed robbery after they robbed a scrap metal dealer of R100,000. The getaway car belonged to a senior police official.
What a beautiful mess You’ve made of me,
Thinking you’re the one that I’ve been waiting for
Architects of War Also had a great booth in the dealers hall. In fact, I *love* they way they display all the plastic kits, with a painted example of the contents on a pedestal behind each stack of boxes. I really wanted to take home the Otherworld giant, but it was way more than I could justify spending.
So once again I told them they should just go home and we would have our Christmas the next day. Ratchlet was worried about TA, the new dog, and she still had the migraine. TA had fallen asleep on the sofa. M-t-G was disappointed but she had at least one gift, so she didn't seemed all that upset at the prospect. So they decided (actually Ratchlet decided) it would be better all around for them to go home. The Big Guy and I were supportive of that decision. They were all either sick, cranky, or worried....not the best of moods for Christmas anyway!
my therapist....she is the first one to really drill down to my issues and not treat me as someone who "just needs to lose weight and all will be perfect". she calls me on my shit and does not let me get away with it.
What kind of poetry do you write? I write eclectically. I’m drawn to short form, but I can spin a yarn now and then. I love to play with words and syllabic forms; I break the rules more often than not. Tillie Olsen’s “triple life” is something that I struggle with and try to explore ways of describing. Poetry is a way of existing.
I have to say my sister and I did a lot better than we thought. We had only trained for 13 weeks (really more like 8 weeks with all the time we took off) and had not jogged or ran for over 25 years when we started the couch to 12k training schedule. We kept our slow but steady pace for the full race and only stopped once to use the restroom. We probably only walked about a mile for the whole 12K and part of it was the frickin huge hills we had to endure. Overall we had a blast and at times were laughing so hard I almost peed my pants.
We were going to go out to dinner but I opted to change things up. I wanted to have Chinese take out and rent a movie just like we used to when we were dating. Back then, when I would worry about money, Hubs would tell me, "We have $12 in the bank. Yay! We can have Chinese!". He's so Glass Is Half Full. :)
This 2011 film deals with a very complicated subject (the 2008 financial crisis) in the simplest of ways, and that’s due in no small part to some good old-fashioned storytelling. The movie (which plays out over a 24 hour time window) never becomes bogged down in numbers and details, even though these become refreshingly clear to just about any viewer as the narrative progresses. Also, the screenplay elevates itself by becoming about its central themes: corporate hierarchies, leadership, accountability, betrayal, trust, etc. (There are many more, but these are the ones that most potently infuse the events that unfold in the film).
Again, I echo the observation about people assuming everything is digitized and available for full display from websites through the finding aids. The mass availability of information online has accelerated this notion, however, I feel archival materials doesn’t have to compete with the web for accessibility. Nor do I feel that archives should be described as self-service. While I feel finding aids should be comprehensive (Duff & Fox; O’Neill Adams) , the level of detail is argueable. Rather, I think we need to provide reasonable access points and quality description. I think the possibility of letting archives be self-serve can lend to loss of intellectual property control, provenance, and context, (i.e. Tumblr). I realize user expectations demand timely reference and open accessibility, archivists may “need to empower the individual” rather than constantly “search for the magic solution for all systems in all institutional and individual applications” (Cox, “Machines in the Archives…’). I guess I’m just a big fan of collaborative efforts between researcher and archivist and even outreach librarian for virtual and on-site reference.
I got some new nail polish from Ulta that had 4 little ones in it. It is the OPI Holland collection. I love all 4 of the colors in it but just wanted to buy the thing with small testers so I could see if I really liked them enough to buy the normal size of nail polish. I used the color called "Red lights ahead..where?" I really like it! Below are the ones it came with.
Grill over medium heat for 10-15 minutes, turning and basting frequently with leftover marinade.
Members of the Tourism Business Council of South Africa welcomed the move, saying they were sure their members would be cleared.
So I ate one. JUST one. I put the rest in the refrigerator before I could be tempted to eat the others.
How unique a concept. Actually talking face to face with other people!
Citizenship: France
I’ve written about my bangstick before, so I won’t repeat myself today. The goal is to send the slug in a spot directly between the eyes and two to three inches behind and angled towards the brain for a humane kill. It must only be used when the gator is a few inches below the water and only when the gator is secured to a restraining line as described above.
“ALL OF THEM?”
He probably won't get here in time.
I loved my mozzarella bites! They are yummy! They will be great to have in the freezer since I’m home for the summer! I might even have to check out some of their other good-looking products! I think some of them could even be used for an easy meal or a nice little party!
Just to let you know, it's when Patton is going over the aspects of the operation that Sandahl Bergman utters he first line. Other than looking fabulous in her black-framed glasses and lab coat combo, Sandahl's character has been mute up until now. Well, that all changes when Sam makes an inquiry about expelling urine (making a pee pee while wearing a cast-iron codpiece could be fraught with foreseen complications). Looking at the confused musclebound mound of unejaculated sperm, she simply tells him, "there's a flap."
The day is filled of fun activities including magic shows, broadway musical and the highlight show of the night, The 2nd Asian Wizardry Fireworks Competition Finals.
I’d heard the voice before.
PKR deputy president Azmin Ali tried to negotiate with police, who told the Gombak MP to calm the group down. But despite his advice they still broke through the barricades.
Iron & Wine – The Shepherds Dog - came out in 2007 and I’m still diggin’ it!
Through Maddy, Kate has even found a nice boy that she could like…one that would actually give her the time of day, unlike Nate, the boy she has been pining after. Kate finds herself with fledgling hopes – she’s become used to the routines of boarding school, she has someone she can talk to in Maddy and she has the possibility of a sweet romance. But she fears she could lose all these things if anyone were to discover her terrible secret and the thing is…secrets? They have a way of always coming out.
Closeup of the fall of Michelle's General (failed Officer survival check - a roll of "1" on a D20!. Despite his loss, as darkness closes in on the battlefield, the Austrians, with almost their entire army routed, still manage to pass their Army Morale Test for the win!
– anonymous
The Gattens introduced us to the the gospel and we began to go to Church with them, and in time Jay baptized us. How can you ever thank someone for having such a profound effect on your lives? That was a gift that we can never repay. It has made such a difference in our lives and brought us so much joy.
“Where all shall see her naked skin . . .”
I’ve been “agenting” for quite some time now, trying to find one to slip my manuscript under your “big, scary door”. The thing is, I am, after all, still learning about how to properly write and polish a five-paragraph essay. God forgive the unlucky soul that tries to take on and read a pitted, grammatically incorrect manuscript that may or may not even be anything more than a big run-on sentence…right? Then again, you have to consider the fact that I have actually picked up a copy of Writer’s Guide to Book Editors, Publishers, and Literary Agents to find your name. It has, unfortunately, become my Bible. You might be surprised at how many tricks a person can pick up after reading a gazillion and one books such as that.
I also wore a belt. The belt bugs though because it does a hangy thing and there is no loop to control the motion of the ocean.
and those are just two of my favorite parts of you.
Historians have made quite a bit of noise (noisy in so much as anyone reads history at all) about the relatively recent provenance of our modern notions of romantic love. Shirley knows the intricacies of those arguments without having to have go the circuitous route of a PhD - by meticulously close attention to the truly "popular culture" of her own people. The selections of this record are all love songs, many of them so robust with stark tragedy as to make most radio-friendly `sad` love songs (even those ones you like) sound positively silly. Shirley provides paragraphs on each song on the record in the notes; there is nothing capricious here, everything was chosen with deliberation. I was about to write more of my own reflections on the tracks here when I looked again at the album and read again the liner notes written by Shirley herself for the original back cover of the LP, thankfully reproduced fully by reissue label Fledg'ling Records. Rather than give my own hackneyed plagiarism, I figured it would better serve Shirley's honor by reproducing her own words below. It is obvious that on top of her stunning musicianship she also possesses a penetrating mind and ability to contextualize her work in a very sophisticated way. So, I will leave the rest to her, other than pointing out that a few of my absolute favorites on this particular album are "The Unquiet Grave," "Lady Margaret and Sweet William" from where she took the album's title" and the incomparable "Polly Vaughn." The album also features Robin Williamson from the ISB on one tune, incidentally.
Do I have to rethink my stance on Scandinavian fiction?
It is the American way actually - to work full time as an employee for the corporations that you worked for (by voting for laws that benefit them) when you were a politician. It works like this - as a politician, you pass laws these firms like, and right after you "retire" from the stressful political world, you are hired by those firms to lobby for them or be on some kind of a 'decorative' position (VP for the department of doing nothing, for example), while getting paid. It is a reward for a politician for voting 'correctly' i.e. voting for the benefit of a corporation or an industry. Thanks for voting against those safety regulations in the coal mines, senator, and now for your retirement welcome to the Coal Mine Industry Lobby - uh, and here's your first monthly check of $150,000...
What do you do to get over your post-race letdown?
The one thing that Green Arrow hasn't really been very good at since the late sixties was actually being a super-hero. Sure, he wears a costume and fights crooks, but the moment he started talking about fighting the causes of problems like drug abuse and poverty and dealing with issues on a street-level basis, he stopped making sense as a dues-paying member of the Justice League. Sure enough, although he remained in the book throughout the sixties and seventies, creative teams since then have faced an uphill battle in terms of providing a convincing rationale for someone like Green Arrow to be on the team. By the time the eighties rolled around most writers gave up trying. Green Arrow remained a mostly inactive member of the League - his history with the team was never erased. But there was always tension between the (real-world) fact that Green Arrow was a big enough name that he could never be cut out of the franchise entirely, and the inescapable conclusion that the character himself often wanted very little to do with fighting world-beaters and alien armadas.
I'm thinking I need to start getting back in the swing of things!
Now, on to the rankings.
my sisters have your eyes and hair;
I Am One Who opens the sixth chakra, allowing you to experience
Watching the sun come up is something you want to do at least once a week – Steve always says,”when the sun comes up its like a new run begins”. Yesterdays sunrise was so beautiful and it helps when you run a beautiful trail like ours because you see a lot of wildlife. We saw at leat 12 deer, a few bunny rabbits and squirrels along our route yesterday”
Thanks to all of you for an amazing year of inspiration and support. I can't wait to see what next year will bring!!
Out on the cusp of the tide was a small dog frolicking in the water’s edge and yapping loudly.
I won’t go into much detail about the movie, but the movie is in Public Domain, so the copyright of the movie has expired, meaning that several small companies dealing in old movies has released the movie on DVD. You can also watch the entire movie on YouTube right here on the blog. Scroll down to the end of the post to watch the movie!
3. Working Hard Isn’t Always About the Money
Use wool for this project, as it is going to be felted.
We cannot afford to have breach of security protocols. From far distances, Dark beings can still exercise influence and probably spy on aspirants. And down below, one’s own Inner Demon could still be actively working within an aspirant, so it always pays to watch out for one’s self.
Must every moment of joy be touched with a hint of sorrow?
and I love my MS birdie punch.
I wonder–how much of spent of textbooks since I’ve been in college. I have had one year at UNR, four years at Mizzou, another semester at UNR (to use up a biiig scholarship), another class at Mizzou through the vet school, and now probably five semesters (hopefully no more) at Riverpoint. And that’s pre-doctorate. That’ll be 2-4 more years. Books I have include chemistry, physics, nutrition, psychology, English, biochem, and I can’t remember if we had to buy a book for microbiology or not. . . Among others.
I couldn’t teach a class, so a substitute was found. When I returned the following week, a student and friend approached me after class and told me she made it into bakasana (crane/crow pose) because K taught it a slightly different way. Initially, I rebuffed her and told her to never step foot in my classroom again. Kidding. Where I begin in a wide angle squat with feet together and heels raised, K begins with the feet farther apart. T went into bakasana with confidence and excitement. She was still super excited a week later.
System: GURPS 4e (listing what books you have will help)
The next day I woke up and started bouncing around excitedly trying to get my family to go down to the Waterpark with me. Mum was busy, so Emi and I went down. It's an all inclusive resort, so the waterpark, rooms, restaurants, convention center, and spa are all accessible without ever leaving trhe building! Emi originally didn't want to go in the wave pool, or on the slides, since the last time she'd been to a waterpark she was about 8 and it terrified her! However, as soon as she saw that there were tubes for the wave pool, she decided she's try it, and we both had a blast! After that, we tried several slides, which were all extremely awesome!
It’s a boatload of work, and I’m eager to get it finished.
As I mentioned at the beginning of this review, if you’re not a fan of Murakami’s writing, 1Q84 won’t change your opinion. The Murakami tropes established by his earlier novels – disappearing women, unsolvable mysteries, perpetually loose plot threads, passive protagonists, close descriptions of genitalia, endless references to jazz records, men cooking alone in sad bachelor kitchens – all appear in force in this novel, which is more of the same, except further up and further in.
I can’t wait to go urinaling with my mom later at the park!
Since my Mother of the Groom dress was a Jasmine/Jade design dress, I decided to concentrate on their web site. I loved the teal color of the dress in the middle, but again, it had a bolero jacket. I just don't think a bolero style jacket is complimentary to a plus size woman. The jacket is meant to be removed after the wedding ceremony, but I would want to keep it on all evening to hide my less than toned arms, and it doesn't look very comfortable to me. I liked the style of the other Jade dresses in the collage above that short sleeves, but I knew I'd have to try them on to see how they would look on me.
“I asked her to explain the reason for her change of attitude to the thing on the wall which in itself had not changed at all; she answered, surprised at my stupidity, that of course the thing had not changed, but she saw it differently since she knew that it was done by Picasso himself and “not just a reproduction”.
"What about some other Caledonian Guest Ales?"
Books Most Destined to Be Re-Read
that will help you to hold your family as one.
you are off the clock you are heading to bed now
These are subtle points, but enough to dissuade a reluctant publisher in the US from acquiring a UK text. British publishers know that and so should you.
Please remember anything goes with craftyness from scrapbook pages to cards we'd love to see anything crafty so long's it goes with our theme!!
How far along? 13 weeks
Unfortunately, however, many companies still see CSR as optional. In reality, all businesses would benefit, in terms of reputation and risk management, from integrating CSR into the heart of their business practice. A company’s good reputation takes years to build but can be ruined in an instant. Furthermore, as consumers become more informed about the negative effects of their consumption patterns, they increasingly turn to ethically minded companies. As such, CSR is no longer solely a question of not harming people and planet but is vital to long term profit.
I’m laughing at myself as I try to figure out why I am writing it. I have found these past two years that if I write it out, whatever it is, I can begin to make sense of what’s going on in my life. It’s rather like thinking aloud, but in print. I hope it still works.
The Partnership remains intact, the ones at the top of the COP will eat ah food….and their party base will find all kinds of ways to defend Prakash’s balls-less grandcharging. Nothing to see here folks, move on….I tell all yuh since last month Prakash aint going no where….and all this talk about principles and hurting the country….where was it for past events?
Yisrael Beiteinu didn’t really want elections, so this is good for them. The downside, their influence has been diluted, perhaps almost completely. One of the goals of this unity coalition is to implement a good replacement for the Tal law. It may happen. Yisrael Beiteinu may even get part of the credit for it, so they can at least bask in the reflected glory.
Be sure to join us in October as My Scraps & More is having a month long sketch contest! Each weekday a new sketch will be unveiled on the forums along with a challenge from a design team member. At the end of each week, a winner will be drawn from all that participated to receive a great scrappy prize! Many challenges will even have RAK’s involved!! Head over to the forums at My Scraps & More to sign up today! This contest runs from Oct 3rd – Oct. 31st.
'The man was astonished and asked, 'So what do I do with these?'
TRUMPED
As in politics and other endeavors where mind-control plays a prominent role, advertising and propaganda are the most effective tools of those who are pitching a program or a product. The reasons for large infusions of cash could be to cover corporate wrongdoing, agency corruption, incompetency or just to hide plain carelessness but usually, profit motive is the driving force.
“10. But the good news is that Darwinism will lose. First, Darwinists will lose because the scientific evidence is against them. Second, they will lose because they treat with contempt the very people on whom they depend the most: American taxpayers. Finally, Darwinists will lose because they are relying on a tactic always guaranteed to fail in America: censorship.” http://www.amazon.com/gp/blog/post/PLNK27XO8HQYK20IX
It would be such a big accomplishment to get over my fear of speaking and to present an inspiring speech in front of hundreds of people. It would be the perfect ending to a great four years at NDNU. Not to mention, my whole family will be there, and they would be so proud of me (not that they aren’t already). Most of all, I would feel so proud of myself for having done it.
-News,
Check/Money Order
“Indeed, regional forum plays an important role in addressing these threats through collaborative use of political, economic, diplomatic and legal means in the true spirit of regional security and defence cooperation.”
Alright. That was just atrocious. I can’t even get myself to read what I wrote. Basically, it’s a paragraph about software and audio piracy. The point is almost lost on me; this is part of an essay on the importance of advertising.
There were several fashionable restaurants in London besides Langan’s: Eleven Park Walk, San Lorenzo’s and Mr Chow amongst them. The latter was presided over by Michael and the late Tina Chow. Upstairs was the place to see and be seen. However, private dinner parties in the restaurant were normally held downstairs. One I attended (dressed in an Ossie Clark dress) was in Karl Lagerfeld’s honour, but he only had eyes for Celia Birtwell (also in an Ossie dress), whose textile designs he recently declared to be the best. (The late Ossie Clark was the inspiration for one of my characters in my novel "Frantic", set in the Seventies). Val Lownes, commonly known as the son of Victor Lownes III, the head of Playboy Europe and the UK Playboy Clubs arrived late, and introduced me to Roman Polanski. This was before the scandal, when Polanski fled the USA after pleading guilty with having sex with a minor. I was mad about his movies and was lost for words, especially when he gave me the number of his hotel room.
So who will Ali choose? Well, we have Roberto, who has the hotness trifecta:
-Hoping that Zach likes being a big brother as much as he thinks he will.
My heart is tender towards the hurting: the ones who have lost their moms to death and the ones who long to be a mom but have yet to bring home a child.
In truth the circumstance is more precise and perverse than this. Images may help. Here are the two places on campus described above, the quad and the Memorial Union, which are in fact immediately adjacent each to the other:
Shine is your debut novel. Was it your first attempt at writing a novel or did you have other manuscripts hiding away?
This time I actually followed my boyfriend's shoe-buying advice and bought a new pair of shoes (on sale) in his favorite brand- Born. They are more sensible than cute, which is an obvious sign of a middle-aged librarian (along with cardigans and pencil skirts, probably), but he assured me they still look good. And they're extremely comfortable.
I’m not a vivid reader of blogs, for neither am I literarily ahead, nor am I patient enough. It’s been years since I read my last novel. But yeah, I get an indifferent urge to write, to blog, as you may call it. Recently I read a blog about Karma, which had some particular things, things which I couldn’t agree upon. So, I decided to point my views.
I'd also like to know what, besides the obvious (good cover image and blurb - and I'm still accepting feedback on both of those), you look for when deciding whether to buy a book? Reviews? Reader quotes? Sales figures?
Those little mantras made me venture into baking with yeast without even me realising it. It was only after I started food blogging did I realise that many fear or feared yeast at one point in their lives. When people write to me about how I go ahead with recipes and come out with success, I tell them my mantra,'Do not fear the ingredients, they can sense it!' Atleast that's what I have been doing. If I see a recipe I want to try, I just try it. I never think about the what if's, but how's etc. Why waste your precious time pondering over such petty issues? ;-)
I pre-heated my gas grill (all 5 burners on high for about 40 minutes) and it was at a solid 550* according to the gauge on top. Because this pie is so thin, it cooks very quickly, not more than about 5 minutes. Do not look away and don’t start something where you may forget. I’m a big fan of a timer. I’m a bigger fan of this pizza and it’s yumminess.
We went out for dinner last night for a friend’s birthday, and I did my makeup and put on a bra (still too small) and wore a cute outfit. I FELT SO MUCH BETTER.
I wonder if he has released any album; I really like the way he played this piece:
262To light the dead, and warm th' unfruitful urn.
Target Holiday Barbie
Another important thing I took from this conversation is the difference between healing and cure. It might not be a difference that many people acknowledge, but it is vitally important to know that there is a difference between being healed and being cured. I’d even argue that they are mutually exclusive.
MAke points of your criticism of you kids
Reggie Evans did his absolute best to make them think about what they had to do. Then the guards had to think about it. Is Griffin that much of a threat on dee? Regardless of his beyond-strong game on offence, Griffin tends to overplay his actions on certain attacks and we’ll get to that in a sec. But when I think about the Clips I don’t think about their smothering catch-you-in-the-paint defence. I think about Chris Paul, simple as that. Then Blake and his bad possibility. He had a terrific game, save the few “hit by a bullet” lapses. Let’s discuss.
the colors of pastel rainbows,
Each tiny indignant property-rights advocate
Neglecting to offer this positive vision, however, will eventually prove detrimental, not only because the mood at the moment is so anti-state and therefore needs countering precisely in the name of Blue Labour/Red Tory, but also because the Tories and (in a much more refined sense) both Blond and Glasman have provided such convincing and damning accounts of statism that unless one is attentive to the risk then the baby might just find itself thrown out with the bathwater.
Young as we grow
Let's Kill Music
I consider myself to be a good shopper and yet I was surprised to learn of some of the retailers that offer a Teacher Discount. In case you didn't know, these are a few of the retailers offering discounts to educators.
I requested the DD-214 as part of funeral pre-planning arrangements I am making with You Stab ‘Em, We Slab ‘Em Funeral Home in Dallas, TX.
In writing this piece, I look down at my own knee-caps, sheathed in ruddy skin, bearing several discernible scars, battle wounds from youthful adventures. I take a moment of gratitude that they are operational and remember that is how they look. If only we could all feel that way about the totality of our bodies – thankful for all they allow us to do, instead of being constantly exposed to damaging messages about how innately inept we all are. So, Forever 21, I implore you to stop digitally altering your models in this way. Also, your labor practices are abhorrent. (See the clip from the documentary
Many people tell him don’t cross. A honk all he can hear.
Well, growing up in Bermuda I didn’t even think becoming a professional actor/performer was a possibility though I’d always performed whether it be theatre, dance, singing and chatting dance hall, you name it. It wasn’t until I was at the University of the Arts in Philadelphia that I saw others preparing to do it for a living and I thought, well alright then. So I worked hard, studied hard, did as much as I could within and outside the confines of my Musical Theatre training program, and later my MFA Drama program at the University of California, Irvine for the required periods of time and then, off to LA to hustle for work. Here I am in Vancouver (and sometimes Toronto, London, NY and LA) still doing it.
Sadly, the unbeliever thinks he is free and in one way he is; free from God; free from righteousness as we see in Romans 6:20. But in being free from God he is bound by the devil. Back in Romans 6:16, Paul penned, “Know ye not, that to whom ye yield yourselves servants to obey, his servants ye are to whom ye obey, whether of sin unto death, or of obedience unto righteousness.”
I’m making an investment in my health, thus saving a minimum of £72 over the coming year. But seeing as I’ve already picked up six prescriptions this month alone, I’m guessing it will be a lot more than that. I shall, of course, keep you posted…
Toilet Paper (can you imagine the alternative?) and feminine products..I dont know how the pioneers did it. Gross.
1 regarded
* Annual Flea Market: house & garden, antiques & treasures, games & toys books & records, sports & camping gear, electronics & small appliances, jewellery, small furniture, tools, men’s, women’s and children’s clothing…
Doris Suk-Yuen Eng, 30, New York, N.Y.
When I was in 7th grade, I had been very sick for a few years. My skin was grey, my hair was dull, and I weighed about 67 pounds. (A healthy weight would have been anywhere from around 95-115 pounds.) People assumed I was anorexic, of course, and there were all kinds of rumors going around about my health problems already. I tried to accept my body as it was, but, truthfully, I hated the way I looked. I just wanted to be healthy, and to gain some weight. The next year, as I began to get better, a doctor advised that I eat ice cream every day to help put on some pounds quickly. Best prescription ever, right? Well, a couple of years later, as a Sophomore in high school, I weighed about 135 pounds. I had reached my goal of gaining weight, and had gone past it. So, even though I was celebrating being well, I still didn’t like the way I looked. Most of all, I was addicted to sweets (still am, really,) and I honestly didn’t feel any healthier than I did when I was underweight.
spooks have ties to the Jesuit coadjutor Clinton family, huh?)
The process begins with cleansing your skin, then the room temperature sugar gel is applied to the area where the hair is to be removed. The sugar gel is then gently kneaded into the skin and hair – don’t worry there is no pulling! Removal is done by a “flick and roll” type of maneuver with their gloved fingers. It also gently exfoliates dead skin. After the sugar is removed, a cleansing spray is applied and there is no sticky residue left behind.
I am closing in on the third revision of The Vrykolakas Deviation. I'll set it aside for a while and give it another read after that. Maybe get someone else to read it as well. And THEN... I don't know. Do I just continue down the indie author path? Do I submit it to a small publisher for consideration? Do I crawl under a rock and mope for a while? I don't know.
She walks alone, the town is bare
Shooting at my humvee from your motorbike,
Co-Pilot
Right beside the skyway I and others were clambering onto the open rock to take pictures. That was way more risky than the skywalk, no obstacles to going over the cliff there, and going over the edge there you are 4000 feet up, and no slowing down until you smack bottom. If I get 25 likes to this post I will consider myself bribed to try and upload my video from edge.
But, I nutted up. Because what else could I do?
Then, last week daughter brought home the term calendar.
Taryn on the Merry-go-round...she didn't "love" it but she didn't hate it either!
1 quart drained yellow corn kernels
Since the conference, SPN’s state affiliates have taken a lead role in pushing virtual schools. Several of its state-based affiliates, like the Buckeye Institute in Ohio, set up websites claiming that unions—the only real opposition to ending collective bargaining and the expansion of charter school reforms—led to overpaid teachers and budget deficits. In Wisconsin, the MacIver Institute’s “news crew” laid the groundwork for Governor Walker’s assault on collective bargaining by creating news reports denouncing protesters and promoting the governor. In March, while busting the teachers unions in his state, Walker lifted the cap on virtual schools and removed the program’s income requirements.
Photograph taken from http://www.indymedia.org.uk/en/2012/03/494271.html Please click on this link to see the photograph of all the NUT actions yesterday and read the article.
He turned to the crowd and said, 'Will those who are
The Sarah Jane Adventures
SJ: But Mummy, why is this rabbit doing this? *points to picture of rabbit in toaster*
The original Brooklyn Eagle (1841-1955) reported on everything from international affairs, politics, and women's issues, to literature, crime and real estate. And, they didn't shy away from a good ghost story either. So in honor of Halloween, we thought we'd share a couple of the spine-tinglers that were published by the old Eagle, though the newspaper sometimes took the fun out of it by reporting a reasonable explanation to the bumps in the night.
Southern Arm: Once you reach the northeastern tip, the trail turns, following a high ridge that offers views of the Lake Brandt dam and marina. Once you descend this ridge, the return trip along the southern arm of the lake is mostly flat until the last half-mile of so. The trail in this section has a pleasant meandering quality that passes underneath some tall trees, including impressive stands of pines. There is a nice beach just to the left of the trail at about the 2.6-mile point that has a good view of a derelict duck blind. (There is no obvious path so you will have to pick your way the short distance through the woods.) When I visited, the beach was littered with discarded mussel shells, a possible sign that an animal, such as a muskrat, had been feeding in the area.
David and I woke up to a very rainy day on Cape Cod.
I do tell in several places in Castle, just to get some information in there the reader has to have and which I can’t do any other way. But I keep those sections to an absolute minimum. I try to work them in as seamlessly as I can and I always know when I’m doing it.
And that was all she wrote. Game Over. Season Over. No More. What everyone thought was an utter certainty a few weeks ago has now slipped through their fingers.
“Let me worry about that.”
Can we
Thanks so much for stopping by and have a great day!!
If you're unsure about which you've written, here's a quick definition of each:
~ Marilynne Robinson, Housekeeping
Why can't I speak in front of others like her?
$100 x 365 = $36,500
The popularity of this food can be found in Antoine Lewis’ (an Indian food writer) recount of an incident that happened to him. A beggar child on the streets of Mumbai he once gave leftover food to, opened the container and told him that he wanted it only if it was Indian-Chinese.
For his actions that day, Captain Freeman was awarded the distinguished Flying Cross, but the men who were there, including the commanding officer, Lieutenant Colonel Bruce Crandall, felt a still higher honor was called for. Through the unremitting efforts of Lieutenant Colonel Crandall and many others and the persuasive weight from Senator John McCain, the story now comes to its rightful conclusion.
In a way, blogging is like motherhood. One may start this journey full of doubts and second thoughts, worried that it would bring more heartaches than fulfillment, thinking perhaps, you were not born with it. Time and attention is sacrificed, giving a piece of yourself, hoping they would understand.
involving him. I guessed I wouldn't feel uncomfortable sitting there, at
The list for filling up these hidden moments are long, sometimes
The Mint Julep Jars shown above, are actually just party favors with Junior Mints inside. A real Mint Julep is a very strong, very traditional Southern drink held up in cheers while, “My Old Kentucky Home” plays before the race starts. They are served in chilled silver julep cups filled to the rim with bourbon, simple syrup, fresh mint and crushed ice, an absolute must for a Derby party!
logistics but Nigeria scores
Huntley first came to Canada in 2004 to work as a carnival attendant. He returned the next year, staying illegally until making his refugee claim.
If you are in the second category, get thinking and getting in tune! Where do you wanna be and where SHOULD you be? You have to deal with it. But deal with it! Stop being such a wuss. That the in-betweeners are gonna get hammered is the over-arching message here.
Anah Daata Sukhi Bhaava!!
outside every construction site
Typhoid fever sucks. Last week, I woke up at about 3 in the morning. My entire body ached. I thought my eyes were bleeding. I had a fever of 104 degrees, possibly higher at times. In the morning, needing to go to the hospital, I really could not get out of bed. I’ve never felt so sick and so helpless. Well, maybe I have.
15% off any of their #1 Best Selling Skin Care line products
"They expressed comfort with disagreement. They didn’t think you have to be the same in order to have a close relationship."
And the reason I can remember all this is that I do indeed have a Google doc set up where I'm tracking my reading. I had a good reading month:
Would your regret having chose me and not the other?
The guacamole was okay. It could have used some salt. As a matter of fact, many items could have used some salt in my opinion and there are no salt and pepper shakers on the table. The enchiladas were pretty good. I enjoyed the meat, but I would’ve liked to have seen a little more sauce on the plate. They were served with black beans and jalepeno corn. I can attest to the fact that the corn was fresh since I found a few corn silks on my plate. The beans could have used more seasoning.
So, any papercrafting project is allowed as long as you stick to black and white only (you can add a little skin colour if needed!)
Tongues wait in the
GO PACK GO... All the way to the SUPERBOWL!! Keep that trophy here at Lambeau Field where it belongs!
The ritual was a turning point for me. For two years I had been 'the grieving mother' supported and loved, yes, but feeling as if I was on an island of grief that only I could experience. But we don't have to lose a child to grieve. We can mourn a damaged childhood, we can mourn the loss of a way of life that our ancestors expected as their birthright, close to nature and each other, we can mourn the devastation of our planet, the suffering of so many children, animals, plants.....grief is something that every single one of us will experience and how we deal with it will have a huge impact on our lives. We can stuff it inside with numbing techniques such as drugs, overeating, drink or retail therapy, or we can let it out... and that's scarey..
Getting back to the point, we would end up eating lunch at school, and then have a heavy tea at about half past four when we got home. Tea usually meant snacks as well, and so we would be well filled up for when mum got home at about five. Dinner was around eight, and we never really had a formal 'sit-down-round-the-table' dinner. We'd get a shout when it was ready, and we went and served ourselves, got yelled at for not taking enough vegetables... grumbled a bit about 'fish again...? I hate fish... moan, mutter'... and usually ate in the front of the TV after a little fight with dad about what we were going to watch (dad usually won, unless there was something mum wanted to watch, in which case, mum won!)
See how cute and easy this easy? This is a great way to use up some of you pattern paper and get lots of cards made. I make Cards for Soldiers with the ladies on the Cricut messageboard and this is what I do to get lots of cards made quickly. So take my idea and make it your own. If you want to share your take on this idea please post a comment. I would love to see what you ladies come up with. Thanks Pam for letting me be a guest on your blog today!
I understood exactly what he meant.
Will what stems from this simply be a ‘normal’ rivalry that many blood-related siblings experience? Or will it fashion a deep-rooted sense of bitterness towards each other and/or the adoption process itself?
Read my other entries by clicking on these links:
The Duprees return to the scene and in my favorite part of the story the news articles says Jimmy Ray Dupree and Bobby Joe Dupree were both listed in stable condition after being hospitalized for injuries suffered in the altercation.
Congratulations Jennifer!!! Please email your address to me at thecraftsmeow@gmail.com and I'll mail your prize right out to you!
11. Last Station (2:46)
Eight (8) Amazing Adventures pages (four almost complete stat).
2. Dip pretzel rods 3/4 of the way into melted orange candy. I ended up pouring the melted candy into a glass to make it easier.
Ha! YES! I am alone, but I’m not lonely. Those terms are not mutually exclusive. I don’t feel “incomplete” or “broken”. I feel awesome actually. I feel like I had to step outside of my comfort zone and see the pieces of me that needed work in order to get here. I wasn’t just fat- I was carrying baggage. Granted, everyone has baggage – but sometimes it’s not worth hanging onto any longer. The clothes I wore at 425 pounds don’t fit me. The attitudes I had about myself and others don’t fit me either. I’ve changed. Evolved. Grown emotionally.
1tsp Ginger paste
THV will also have features with live performances coming up on several great internet TV shows to include GOTV.com and Groupee.com Indie 103 Los Angeles has been a great supporter of THV and after performing at several of their Viper Room nights and being featured on such Indie 103 programs as “Check One Two” and Mark Sovel’s weekly lunch time show as featured band of the day, Hiram was asked to create some new original art for upcoming Indie 103 promotions with Fresh and Easy, USC games as well as other promotions in the works.
Shlohmo is a legend, taking the art of a ‘dubstep drop’ to a whole new level. It’s sophisticated, beyond the cliche “GET THE FUCK OUTTA HEREEE WUB WUB WUB WOBBBBB WOBBBB” style filth that makes your body contort and bang around like something out of the exorcist on the dance-floor, Spoons is dubstep for your brain, allow the various lobes to bob around to the beat while your cerebellum chills with the groove. There’s something almost acidic about it, like an acid-meets-hip-hop hybrid, the sounds coming out of the Wu Tang Clan’s mouths if Aphex Twin and Skream were spit-roasting them rhythmically one at a time.
About the only negative thing I have to say about this book is that it’s almost certainly doomed to have a very limited appeal. Unless you’re a giant Diablo lore geek, a collector, or an aficionado of sepia tone drawings, there’s very little reason for you to pick up “The Book of Cain.”
“It’s like coming into someone’s house and saying, ‘Do you want me to take my shoes off?’ When you’re a guest in somebody’s house, you’re kind to them,” he said.
Indy had put on 300 grams when we weighed him after his bath, but he may still have been a bit damp and retaining water. At least that’s what he said. He also claimed that the stress of being on a diet had made him gain weight.
How about yours?
Dawn, I'll keep this short as I know you are busy.
- How the poor pay the price for D.C.’s height limits (WaPo, 4/28) “For a city with so much poverty and a dearth of affordable housing, any policy change with the potential to reduce the cost of housing should get careful consideration.”
Chocolate Marmalade Slump Cake
His Highness the Aga Khan, Chancellor Aga Khan University (AKU) and AKU Board of Trustees endorsed the suggestions in 1989 that AKU Alumni Association be formed so that the University could keep track of its alumni especially those who left for USA/UK/Europe for postgraduate training, and to record the career pathways of the returning alumni. Hence, AKU Alumni Association came into being in 1993. (…)
These lighter, more summery dishes may have pushed heavier favourites from earier visits, like Coppa di Testa, off the menu. But if this warm pigs head terrine makes its way back any time, know that the tangy pickled shallots which balance the slivers of soft, fatty pressed meat offer a wonderful, zingy mouth experience on a perfectly grilled slice of filone bread that you shouldn't miss out on.
materials you have to make a nice soft place for
I’ve never had a tasting menu before. I’ve always understood it to mean a menu designed by the chef to show off his skills, providing a range of flavors in one meal. I never knew it meant death by gluttony, albeit a slow and pleasurable one.
It was the middle of winter and dark outside. I was given a large empty room, but I only had one studio light with me, and I had about half an hour before he had to be downstairs for his performance. I switched off the overhead lights and shot by illumination of the single light, creating stark shadows and a deep moody atmosphere.
The above is a Yabuta press, which resembles an accordion, is used to separate the fermented sake from the lees. Each of the panels is a fine mesh, which prevents the lees from getting through. To make nigori, the mesh panels usually have larger holes, allowing some of the lees to pass through.
For the second doll, I realized there were a lot of stories coming in with your entries. Each one touched my heart and I wish I could give a doll to every one who wants one, especially those kids who don't get to see one parent or another as often as one might wish. So I went through the stories, did a little research and chose my second winner not randomly but on a "She so needs a Daddy Doll" reaction.
I feel like I shouldn’t, but I know what feels right
String the shells on the wire or stringing material in the set order.
Me? I'd rather have spring come slower and later, and have more fruit survive.
So now, with that in mind, I can show you my splits. I started going up the incline.
Of course, you still need to know the basics of good writing, reporting, editing and production, but go after internships that are Internet-based. And keep a very professional Web presence — everything you say or do online can be tracked down. Maintain a blog, if not a full website.
1990
Here are just two short anecdotes:
We have watched our two Lovefilm picks for the month. Given how little we are able to get out, and how crap television is in general, Lovefilm has been a valuable addition to our lives, and is significantly cheaper than Blockbuster. In fact, the ease of online film renting and viewing is probably why Blockbuster is struggling.
Second, once you've decided on what you are going to make you need to decide on how you are going to make it. Of course you can buy the cake molds buy it is more cost effective to use oven-safe bowls, cake rounds, muffin tins, cookie sheets, or 9x13's to come up with the shape you need. It is helpful to freeze the cake for an hour or so before you start placing, cutting and frosting. This allows for less mess and makes each cut more precise. You'll find that making a cake at home is much cheaper than buying a cake at the grocery store. You will be using your cake mixes and powdered sugar out of your food storage.
Don’t get me wrong; I still have to pinch myself to grasp that my books are getting published, and I’m grateful for every publicity opportunity. But I’m not exactly a born salesman (my Girl Scout pitch was, “You don’t want to buy any of these cookies, do you? No, really, you don’t have to. . . .”) and my inner introvert is sometimes loath to loosen its death grip on my personality. It doesn’t help, of course, that many book-publicity opportunities are awkward under the best of circumstances (“No, I don’t want a copy of your book, but can you watch my purse while I run to the restroom?”) or that the economy is in the tank (“No, I don’t want a copy of your book, but I was wondering if you could chip in toward my utility bill.”)
1 darkened
Every Monday morning I plan the weekly menu, write a shopping list, and order everything. Around noon I get a phone call that always starts like this, “Hi, this is Bob from Price Cutter. When would be a convenient time for me to deliver your groceries?”
09. Side 2 side (prod. by Trained Monkeys)
T. Rowe Price 1000 (minimum waived with $50/month auto contribution)
Yes, I caved in. I have watched the first episode of Season 2 of Game of Thrones -- and I LOVED IT!!!
Goddess to aid in her healing as she continued to ink in the design. The hours
When the Observation Deck at the very top of the Rockefeller Center opened in 1933
That’s a lot of skills, isn’t it?
Bhansali was very impressed by the music they had created for the Atul Kulkarni and Sonali Kulkarni-starrer Natrang.
She told the court, that her choice to aim the gun at him, after aiming it in a vague direction, further enraged McClain and he beat both of them with butt of the gun, the jury heard.
When Toronto design guru Christopher Wood told me that he wanted to showcase my work in his chic King West furniture store, it was like winning the lottery. Christopher has impeccable taste and I feel like this month's IT-GIRL with an installation in one of Toronto's uber-chic furniture stores, LA Design!
Reminds me, ever so peripherally, of an all-women event i attended a year or so back, which involved flash cotton and not a lot of body cover. All perfectly good natured fun – and quite impossible, i think, had blokes been present.
Each and every time path in addition uses, to there are a selection regarding a variety of and also so on.
Patterned Papers: K and Company Classic K Charlotte Paper Pad
Thanks to all who joined us for our Sparkle and Shine challenge last week. Sooooooooooo many entries but all fantastic. I knew you were all magpies out there LOL.
Starring: John Cho, Kal Penn, Rob Corddroy, Danneel Harris, and Neil Patrick Harris
was the tabula. Before in the
The "wonder" in Liliana's eyes...
We are BEYOND excited at the opportunity to have children. We've already started creating our 'book'. It's this little gem that, once complete, will sit in front of the birth mother in hopes for us to be the perfect couple for her baby.
If your chasing a bargain or you know someone who is. Here it is. Australian stock with Australian Canon warranty, Canon 5D MK111 with Canon 24-105 IS USM lens @ $4750 Post included. No there’s nothing dodgie, just a good deal for a short period.
49And the word of the Lord went through all the country.
Meaning: Gateway
1/3 cup pitted prunes
Between those two extremes are the cynics including politicians and the very rich who gain short term material gain from the joint enterprise, the third world racists who are doing it out of hate, and the white inverted racists, whom Pat Buchanan refers to as "ethno-masochist", people who delight in inflicting harm on their own ethnic group so as to earn what they view as moral credits.
The next place we found was an arcade. The boys played some Silent Hill and then we took some photo booth pictures. These kind of photos are really popular with school girls in Japan. The machine automatically softens skin and makes eyes wider. So, you can imagine what kind of a hilarious effect that had on two guys! After you take the photos, you can deck them out with graffiti and frames then they print and you can put them all over your notebooks or motorcycles or what have you.
This does not mean that Israeli Christians do not occasionally encounter intolerance. But in contrast to elsewhere in the Middle East where hatred of Christians is ignored or encouraged, Israel remains committed to its Declaration of Independence pledge to "ensure the complete equality of all its citizens irrespective of religion." It guarantees free access to all Christian holy places, which are under the exclusive aegis of Christian clergy. When Muslims tried to erect a mosque near the Basilica of the Annunciation in Nazareth, the Israeli government interceded to preserve the sanctity of the shrine.
I mention these things just so you know what influences my views on photography, craftsmanship and art in this upcoming series.
As a reminder, three candidates have been identified for the role of Associate Dean for Academic Affairs and Diversity for the College of the Environment. Each candidate has been invited to make a presentation, open to students, staff and faculty, addressing the following questions:
If you have any questions, please let us know.
Meanwhile I had missed out (again) in Vancouver and actually not far from home, the art murals along the north base of Granville Bridge off-ramp at Seymour St. Usually a cyclist’s attention is diverted away from the mural details at this intersection since there may be either fast flowing car traffic or off-ramp cars ready to merge with traffic along Pacific Blvd. Hardly a great place to notice art. Yet I had been cycling by this area often, oblivious to the murals for the last 8 years.
He sounding rose into the heavens in naked majesty
the status that real work conferred, excited them.
Awww, I am the queen of doing projects and not sharing them with you for months. This is another example. Remember when I spotted this photo in a Houzz ideabook a couple of months ago?
It was their university share house in Manchester that spawned the cult hit The Young Ones, the worldwide success that launched their careers, in which Mayall and Edmondson played Rick and Vyvyan respectively.
I'm having internet problems for the past couple of days. When I click to either open or close a webpage my internet stops working on me. Whether I am looking at a blog or trying to open a FB link from my mail - does not bother. It is taking me forever to get anything done, and I have a terrific tutorial to post for you, but I can't download any pictures!
I went to Bar le Forum, prompted by an email from my friend Dayne, asking if I had been and pointing out that it had been nominated by Tales of the Cocktail for 2008 Best Classic Cocktail Bar (also among the list is my current favorite Paris cocktail bar: Experimental Cocktail Club.) I have to say I am a tiny bit surprised that it was on the nomination list – mainly because it seems a good cocktail bar for Paris – but that list pretty much covers the world. Now, my impression may be a bit skewed because normally I sit at the bar where I can watch, question and interact if possible. This time the group of 7 or so was larger than usual (including friends, Paul and Lauren, who joined us all the way from Seattle for this Cocktail Adventure) so we sat at a large table away from the bar. So, being happily involved with my friends, I’m sure I wasn’t as attentive to the bar going-ons as usual.
Nancy Nall points out a New York Times blog post about the price we’re paying for fewer editors. It’s true, and it’s affecting not only your local newspaper but even major books from quasi-reputable publishing houses.
The light will rise, bringing us with it.
This morning on Facebook I found an awesome rebate! Who doesn't use Lysol Wipes right? They are giving you an opportunity to recieve $3.00 back when you purchase 3 Lysol products.*
You replace the toilet-paper roll when it's empty (0)
At work, I talk with our fabulous new recruit, Laura. She is taking over my job. She is perfect for it and I love watching her shine with enthusiasm for getting and keeping people healthy. What a find she is!
Ok, I'm going to see if I can get this Rattler Vision working...
They are being handsomely rewarded for not doing their jobs!
One day when I woke up the earth looked as it had a soft white blanket covering it. snow was gentely pelting to the ground….I stood staring at it for a while. It was beautiful….just beautiful! I could not stop staring at a sight like this! So then I ran down stairs to see the frosty world! First I put on my nice and cozy skipants, second I put on my extremly fluffy Black coat, Then I put my wonderful warm Bog Bots, after that I put my furey pink hat on, Then last of all I put on my puffy, warm, Black, mittens. I finily was all ready to go out side when all the suden. ”FG what are you doing? It’s five in the morning!” “Yeah I know it’s five and I am going outside. Just look how beauitiuful it is!” “Anyway have you eaten Breakfast?” “Yes ummmmmm NO……but I am not hungrey.” “You should eat before you go outside….and that is not a choice.” ”fine.” ”I am going back up to Bed so your on your own.” ”OK!” After that I cooked up some yummy yellow fresh chiken eggs and some wonderful crispy brown backon. After that finlly I started to go outside….when I tool a step out I said ” Oh my gosh! This is….the best…..THING I HAVE SEEN SENSE LOBSTER!!!!!!”
‘What’s that?’
Hear a song that echoes cheerly
Into lungs
Who had killed the child, and why? And why stuff her in the old television console? If she—Melanie—hadn’t been so wrapped in her own misery, could she somehow have prevented the tragedy?
Angiotensin II signaling and HB-EGF shedding via metalloproteinase in glomerular mesangial cells.
Sacrificial Lam
I know that many of my generation and older have no understanding of the disease and think it’s simple to fix. There is a belief that the person can “just get over it” or “just eat some food” and they will be well. Contrary to that beilief, Eating disorders are serious and fatal diseases, like cancer, diabetes and many others – there is no “quick fix”. Anorexia is a mental illness (just like depression); it is the most fatal of all mental illnesses, the hardest to treat, and the more starved the brain becomes, the more entrenched the disease becomes and the longer it lasts. What sufferers and families need is for society to listen to the advocates & educators in the ED area; to gain knowledge, understanding and in doing so to gain compassion.
I knew I had to get to a bathroom within about 5 minutes or I was going to basically shit myself.
“so that we would no longer be enslaved to sin.” Think about slavery, what are its main attributes? Obviously it forces someone to do something, sometimes against their will, sometimes not. In our case, we were willing slaves to sin. Also, it involves complete and utter control; what a slave eats, what he drinks, the place where he lives, even the time he has to wake up is all controlled by his or her master. Now what happens if that slave, after, let’s say a decade, of enslavement, runs away. His or her time as a slave is by this time so ingrained into them, their likely to continue getting up at the same time as they used to, possibly they’ll want to eat and drink the same things they used to, the only real thing that changes is that they no longer have to. But now let’s introduce a third scenario:
The down side of having an acre of land? Having to keep it up. Thankfully the land lords left their riding lawn mower! Now all we have to worry about is the two giant Maple Trees in our back yard that are dumping thousands of leaves all over our back yard that we'll have to clean up! Oh well, the view and land is worth the sacrifice!
On October 24, 2008, Charles Krauthammer wrote “First, I will have no truck with the phony case ginned up to rationalize voting for the most liberal and inexperienced presidential nominee in living memory.” Columnist Patrick J. Buchanan, on October 31, 2008, wrote “If Barack Obama is not a Socialist, he does the best imitation of one I’ve ever seen.” So, yes, we were warned and, yes, a majority of voters refused to acknowledge the obvious.
I took off with the original documents to bring to the title company in Fort Worth. The two trucks and three guys JP picked up the kids from daycare, dropped the Austin keys at the realtor, and delivered the cable box and modem to Time Warner. Then he remembered the attic above the garage. It wasn't packed- we'd told them about it, they'd asked about it, and then at some point in the 5-hour pack and load madness we both forgot. I frantically called the moving company, which tracked down the trucks, which sent one back to meet JP back at the house. The truck got caught in traffic, JP waited with two kids missing naptime for two hours with no furniture or food. JP and the mover got the attic stuff loaded and left Austin about thirty minutes before I arrived in Fort Worth.
They give you several directions and then they start with the jury pool selection. This sweet lady, who has probably been there since the building was built, puts all of our name cards in this box that looks older than dirt. She then shakes it and calls a name, shakes it, calls a name, shakes it, calls a name until the right amount of jurors have been called. I was finally called in the third round of names.
I'll try to get back in action ASAP!!!!!
I’ve spent the last few days in Alsace and can’t remember when I found a region so dominated by a single cheese. Even the Jura has Morbier and Mont d’Or as well as the ubiquitous Comté.
Leave it to the mysterious grace and mercy of God to regard the low estate of His handmaiden and then to have her called blessed by all generations. This is not a post-reformation contest between Mary and Jesus but a recognition of ongoing greater realities at work in the genealogy of Mary and God's only begotten Son.
#109- Windows
~Robert Morgan
After a week of excessive Advil intake and RICE (rest, ice, compression and elevation) treatment, I went back to the nursing station for a check-up. With not much improvement, I was given crutches and told to wait another week. A week later, another check-up turned into a disconcerting and mind-boggling conversation about torn menisci, knee surgeries and prolonged recovery times that left me imagining, much to my despair, botched summer plans and a future deprived of running and hiking.
2 tbsp butter at room temperature
Because in my opinion the one thing that hasn’t improved as this sport has moved from amateur to professional is our organization. During the evolution from AAU, to TAC, to USATF we have yet to develop real coordination among all the training factions that actually make up our “National” teams. The athletes have lots of “physical” tools – tracks, shoes, masseurs, and coaches. But we lack coordination. You may have your own coach, and he/she may be good at one aspect of your event, but perhaps there are others that have better expertise in other aspects. You as the athlete however,only have access to your own coach. Training “camps” don’t come together. So while we have some of the best coaches and minds in the world, they are not accessible to all. I watch Walter Dix sprint and I see all the things that are missing in his race that are present in Tyson Gay’s – and I sorely want to see them on the track working together if only for a couple of weeks – sharing training tips and technical expertise between athletes and coaches. So I look at how we can be better coordinated.
(…to be continued…)
2. Place cut side down in shallow baking dish with 1 inch water.
First time mom Taryn says, "There are a variety of ways to design a gender neutral nursery and birds are one theme that fits perfectly! I designed the room to be gender neutral because we didn't know what we were having until the big day! I chose a bird inspired theme and wanted to keep the style of the room on the more modern/contemporary side. I went with dark gray walls and pops of orange and teal. I made all of the artwork in the room including the canvas wall art and the bird mobile. I love how the room turned out! It's inviting, completely one of a kind and something my daughter can grow with.
The inept rise to the highest level of incompetence.
Rod Stewart – Sailing
There was reason for optimism last year. The summer movie line-up on paper looked to be as strong as has ever been offered in the multiplexes in recent memory, maybe ever. Studio accountants looked forward to a strong and profitable summer.
Yeah, it's wrapped up but what if a security guard or some other person gets all nosey and takes a look to see what it is?? I tossed and turned - fretting - and had a story made up if I should get busted. It must've been a prank, I have no idea what it is or where it came from....
Dear Sheila,
Why did I not know where I was when I woke up this this morning?
Look for genuine wasabi at high-end grocery stores.
Not 5 minutes later as luckily I was close. That Sivasana still there travelling deep in my belly, I found an overall sense of calm and peace. I belive in birth and I hold that true. As a side note we live in the city but are 40 minutes (on a good day) travel to the nearest hospital, this is not the first time unexpected home birth has happened, and untill our maternity choices change, for some mothers, it will not be the last.
ik word omlaag getrokken
Laws have never been intended to effect a change in peoples' hearts; they're meant to effect changes in behavior, whether it's a law against stealing others' property or a law against refusing to serve people because of their skin color. Therefore, laws are required to combat (acts of) racism. Governments pass laws. Therefore, the government is the PERFECT way to combat racism. QED.
Tomorrow night. Because, you know, long day. I'm tired. Kiss kiss!
Once the kilt was designed, the Scottish went online to register it. We recently found out that we can’t use just the Scottish’s surname because your clan/family name would have to be registered by the the Court of the Lord Lyon in Edinburgh and that is usually reserved for historic family clans that already have tartans. And I totally get that, plus we can’t just make a kilt for every person with that last name, but we CAN make it specific to our branch of the Scottish’s last name. The woman at the Scottish Register of Tartans suggested we use both of our last names with a hyphen in between. So not only will my new last name be associated with the kilt but also my maiden name, pretty cool right?
What you’ve seemed to overlook is that it is also a matter of public interest that we use all means available - lawfully and responsibly - to help protect the American people from the deadly threats of terrorists. I am deeply disappointed in the New York Times.
Peace processes, peace feelers, peace negotiations, peacekeepers, peace monitors… What is this thing called "peace" that everyone seems so preoccupied with?
Anything making you queasy or sick: Super sick this last week. Starting early and going away around 1:00 pm. Then it comes back around 5:00pm lasting until bedtime.
I think that, if either the original trial had gone against him, or he had received only a nominal award, the matter might have ended there. However the damages were of such magnitude, far more than many injury victims would be awarded, that it was understandable that the NotW would challenge the verdict, primarily because such an award in Scotland would significantly have raised the bar for defamation awards in the future. The NotW could afford the sum in this case, but not if it regularly lost that amount in the Scottish courts.
A special guest taking part in the consecration was Bishop Alexander’s brother, Protodeacon George Golitzin, who was representing Bishop Alexander’s family. Also in attendance were representatives from the Theology Department of Marquette University. Another special guest at Friday evening’s service was Bishop Leonard Blair, Roman Catholic Bishop of Toledo.
I don’t have anything really that interesting to say, except that I’ve now got 15 followers here on WordPress! Thank’s guys! ♥
Pádraic Gilligan is VP of Industry Relations at MCI and VP of MCI’s DMC unit, Ovation Global DMC. Ovation has partnered with SCIB in the creation of the inaugural Ovation Trophy, a “marvellous adventure” style journey from Lucerne to Zermatt. Huge thanks today and every day to Barbra Albrecht, Guendalina Rampazzi and to our own Aoife Delaney for pulling it all together.
The metal hair pin lookin' thing close up on the right is an old gate hinge. Back in the day, it was hard to get hinges like we use now. The two straight edges were bolted to the fence post (there would be one at the bottom of the gate and one at the top), and the gate was built so the gate edge closest to the fence had a post that sat on a rock and the post swiveled in the round part of the metal. We see them quite often still in use today; they stand the test of time.
6. Holes - Sachar (1998)
"The ball was given either by King Louis XIV, or his brother the duc d'Orléans. La Maupin attended in a cavalier's dress and played that role to the hilt, but without concealing her own identity or sex, it would seem. She centered her attentions on one beautiful young lady, whose time she monopolized. They had several dances together, and when the guests' conversation buzzed with speculation about them, La Maupin suggested a more private tryst and sealed the proposal with a passionate kiss out in the middle of the dance floor.
All this Will and Kate hype has been really annoying.....but I think andrew and I might actually get up and watch the wedding in the morning. It is history afterall.
* my kids- awesomeness with legs.
services at very reasonable prices. Whatever your choice, take into account that different languages very often mean different paragraph lengths. So don't forget to keep text separate from images and graphics. For this purpose, the cascading style sheets (CSS) is definitely a good tool to incorporate, since it allows you to control the layout of your page by keeping graphics separate from content.
2. Public figures getting caught with just about anybody and everybody BESIDES their spouse/gf/bf yougetmypoint.
David and his lovely wife spent some time chatting with us - they are terrific! Such warm and kind people.
BUT, a year and some months later…as we begin to deal with the emotional scars…the lack of Empathy, entitlement, self surviving behaviors, an incapability to see others needs and pain…we turned back to a very simple, but hard to do principle. The absolute importance of Service.
So, I don't rise to his provocations, so he decides to just throw a punch. Despite my size, I'm decently agile, plus he was slow as fuck anyway. So it wasn't hard to dodge. I dodged a few punches and he just got madder and madder while the sarcastic smirk I wore got bigger and bigger. I was refusing to fight. I didn't see the point in it and I didn't really have anything to prove. I mentioned his fanbase earlier right? Yes I did. Anyway, he goes back to one of them, and I see her point to her lip. She's telling him to hit me on the lip.
Mothers, those wonderful ladies who ruin so many children with their demented ways! Let us take a moment to thank them all for their domineering religiosity, their incestuous lust, their Puritanical hatred of sex, their whoring about with a cavalcade of strange men, or just their all-around emotional inaccessibility - all the wonderful things that have given so many screenwriters so much to work with over the years. Happy Mother's Day to all the moms out there, and I hope your sons never wear your flesh like a housecoat.
Erase you
Think of them this way - Daddy Met scolded his Boys of Bummer in a manner never undertaken by him before. It was a good old fashioned rip-job; albeit in an interview for print. But if you're a man about things (pardon the usage Ladies), you take your constructive criticism in stride and move on.
Last week, my colleague, Professor Tom Hammond, showed me Sanford Insurance Company maps of the Lehigh Valley dating as far back as 1885. Anyone who thinks that the changes are over should study this series of maps– better yet, visit the new Broughal Middle School in Bethlehem, the Overlook Park neighborhood in Allentown, or the Silk Mill project in Easton. While we once thought of community architecture as a matter of aesthetics or economics (what could we build?), as we look forward we see stunning health, social, and economic benefits that are possible when communities are designed in thoughtful ways.
Lesson 1: Get treats the cat likes and hold them in front of the cat but just out of reach. Tell cat to sit. Tell cat to sit again. And again, and again and again.
1424 ***D-IV/26/2002. “’And This Also Has Been One of the Dark Places of the Earth.’” Basic Program Weekend Conference on Joseph Conrad’s Heart of Darkness, The University of Chicago, Alpine Valley Resort, East Troy, Wisconsin. (Incorporated in Item B-14 (Projected), above, Part B-9.)
I always walk away from a Tyler Perry film with a valid message but the means in which he decides to get to that valid point are sometimes distracting from the lesson. I believe seeing a man in a dress pretending to be a woman is absurd. When I watch any form of entertainment on television or in the movies I want to be able to connect with the characters some how, I want to be able to see at least a small piece of myself in one of the characters so I can relate, in many of Perry’s movies I don’t necessarily see that.
Belfast Zoo celebrates world tapir day, with feeding times, keeper talks and competitions on April 28 and 29.
You are sure interested in me. Out of the 100 visits my site meter shows you represented 21 of those visits, that is almost 1/4 of all of my visits!
www.photoireland.org
04. P.D.A. (We Just Don't Care) - John Legend / 4:38
***** Central Florida ESA is a Powerhouse!! *****
5) Post to your blog, post to Facebook
was at ease.
Have you ever heard of Modnique? If you have or haven’t, let me give you a quick run down about Modnique. This is a shopping site where you can find designer brands for discount prices. You have to register on the website to be able to shop. They don’t have an app for your cell phone but they do have a mobile shopping site. Here are just a few examples of brands I have seen on Modnique: pre-owned Rolex, pre-owned Louis Vuitton, Ed Hardy, Michael Kors.
-Even as a northern city, Indy has a shot at hosting a Super Bowl. The joyous and notably peaceful celebrations in Monument Circle after the game and the parade later today will show Indianapolis as a city that knows how to celebrate. The city had virtually no shot to host the 2011 game before. Indy still can't be favored, but now it's a legitimate contender. All because they just won a Super Bowl.
One final point worthy of mention is the artwork produced for the project by Scrying Eye Games. I've used two of the pieces here, with ArmChairGeneral's permission. As can be seen, it has a great antique feel, suggestive of etchings, and it brings a darker mood. I've mentioned the homebrew effect of the earlier elements in the system, but that's much less obvious this time round. The leatherbound effect on the cover works well too, and even the design of the page edging is a variation on that in the earlier documents. In the few months since I first looked at an ArmChairGeneral product, things have come a long way. The ambition isn't letting up and the results are clear to see.
I have been dreaming of having his much raved beef tartar. I have never had beef tartar before, so what better time to try it. I just hope I am not spoiled from it. The texture of the raw beef, the seasoning, the garlic in the fries. It was just heaven on a plate. I also had 2 plates of crispy fried chicken wings with the wife's help, which were out of this world. This stuff had sex with my taste buds. That's the best way I could tell you. I loved it all!
Cmdr. Patrick S. Dunn, 39, Springfield, Va.
We’re in the presence of more than 50 of the bravest men who’ve ever worn the uniform and I want to welcome you all to the White House.
8. If I were to hand you an orange, how would you get the peel off?
Mad Men is not a show depicting past times in America. It isn’t a look at how the advertising world of Madison Avenue has evolved. It is, in fact, a rather successful attempt at showing people how little we have changed. In a sense it is a wake up call. People continue to believe we have advanced so much, as a whole, both morally and intellectually. Alas, this is not the case. People are fundamentally the same, and this will, arguably, always be the case. It is simply part of human nature to do what we want. We look out for ourselves. We try to look out for others; we occasionally give a passing thought. But in the grand scheme of things we are all that matters. Self fulfillment, self advancement. That’s what matters. Mad Men conveys these ideas through a beautiful past world, but that doesn’t make the issues any less relevant today.
1/4 cup yogurt (I used Greek; if you prefer nonstrained, you might try vanilla)
anyways, that's my sob story for the year. but the good news is, i found these gorgeous pictures on tumblr and thought they would be super pretty together for a friday 'pretty picture' compilation.
But take care! And have a great week everyone!
Qingdao’s old town is littered with red-and-yellow colonial German architecture, winding cobbled alleys and plenty of street food. Sloping down the hill from our hostel (a cool converted observatory) was a food market serving everything from fresh fish to fluffy chickens and fried bread. Every few feet we spotted kegs of beer on the sidewalks, and saw locals walking with a jin of Tsingtao swinging in a plastic bag. A bag of beer in one hand and a baby in the other – I wish I’d caught that one on camera! We made it to the new town too, home to sleek and shiny seaside skyscrapers, but it’s the old town that has all the character.
She sang commercial jingles for such companies as Stouffer’s and General Foods, which she said paid well.
Jewelry, clothing, buttons and badges-- you're welcome to submit anything wearable, as long as you've incorporated at least one Tim Holtz product and/or technique. Idea-ology pieces are a natural fit for this challenge, but you could also decorate a T-shirt or scarf, make a hair ornament... there are so many options!
In 2009, a piece of my art that I'd actually done in 2007 was chosen for an exhibition.
Connor not only slept through the night, but he even slept in a bit this morning! So I think he's getting used to having somebody in the room with him. I'm wondering if he'll have some issues this weekend when all of the sudden somebody isn't in there; we'll just have to see how he weathers the transition.
A similar thought occurred to me when I fell ill seriously decades and decades ago and had to be admitted in nursing homes in Bihar twice. I wondered why they called it ‘nursing home’ when a more honest nomenclature would have been ‘cursing home’. What else when you are reduced to cursing your fate and swearing at persons under whose charge you have been placed?
Since no one wanted to help me, I have decided to appeal to the public and say that there are in this house corpses, the stench is unbearable.
Ian Denley, representing the defendants, said the couple thought of the house as an “animal sanctuary”, taking in animals that might have otherwise been put down from friends and from people contacted through the internet.
I bought these Fiskars Take-Apart Softgrip Garden Shears ($10.15) back in early spring, and hardly a day goes by when I don't use them at least once in the kitchen or garden.
capturing your heart with one beat
Moe Berg - U.S. All-Stars
The hotel serves breakfast between 7 and 9 a.m.,
8) Menu planning:
A regular piece for the Daily Mail Weekend magazine about how figures in history might have twittered or tweeted or whatever, had they the chance, inclination and technology.
The shaman initiate glances back down at his dream shell and sighs heavily. His newest work, his grand pattern, spread right across the heart-weave, is Thaneen’s name in witch-rote. Well.
They didn't know that I felt God that September night. Felt a presence that is indescribable. One that I will never forget. I grew up that day. I had a purpose. I was a mother. But that first night being a mother, I looked at my first born one last time, kissed his forehead and whispered to him how much I was going to miss him. And God knows I miss him still.
Ok ladies if we will head back down stairs I have refreshments for every one!!! I do have a wonderful huge not quite a sunroom room that is at the back of our detached garage. I have such wonderful plans for this room and hope you will come back and visit when it and the other rooms get dressed finally!
“Oh, geez! What was this guy’s name again?” to:
Yesterday, I posted my humble Versatile Blogger Award acceptance speech and fulfilled all the requirements for winners, including listing 7 little known facts about myself.
When duty called, Elvis went into the Army. From all accounts I've read, he was popular with the other soldiers in his company and he just did his job with a minimal of fuss. In the 60s and 70s, we had folk singers and rock and roll bands protesting the war and singing songs about burning draft cards and badmouthing America every chance they got.
So, I’m going to write through my anger just to get it out.
The next dream took place inside of a hospital-like building, and I think that a family member of my former classmate JC was having a baby; and so people were coming to the hospital.
Pimpf — interstitial short story set within a year of The Jennifer Morgue
Thank you for your beautiful work on these cards!
Salt 1/2 teaspoon
To tell you “I love you” as I fall asleep. Because even though I have tried I can’t say it to you when I am awake.
Once again the children dressed in their simple clothes and today carried their gas masks (well covered boxes made to look like gas mask cases).
In that period of disposable income, I amassed a weight of LPs, 12” and 7” singles, the odd EP and even a few 10”s. At times, I needed my Echo & The Bunnymen-style overcoat to get back to my bedroom without the guilt of being challenged with the inevitable, “not more bloody records, surely?” Let’s just say that in recent years my better half confessed that she only really believed I was finally making the 250-mile move from Surrey to join her in Lancashire when the first car-load of vinyl arrived at her house in late 1993.
Gardiner (baptised 1686 – d.1745) married Lady Frances Erskine, daughter of David, ninth earl of Buchan, in Edinburgh on 11 July 1726. They had thirteen children, of whom only two sons and three daughters survived their father.
As a starting point I asked myself, (and indeed was asked by a certain someone, who is partially responsible for this year’s bout of self-reflection): if I could do anything in life, regardless of the monetary remuneration involved, (I rarely worry about the monetary remuneration involved), what would it be?
Secretary of Defense and Veterans Affairs: Congressman Alan West.
... i've been meaning to get around to taking part in the excellent bloggers scream for ice cream challenge since its inception by the delightful Kavey a couple of months ago but you know how fundamentally lazy I am, plus I have a rather small freezer and the thought of having to place the stupid ice-cream maker in there 24 hours before I want ice cream just annoys me to hell... who is that prepared...?
Okay if you are young that was a compliment men gave about a woman years ago.
Thank you, thank you so much to Stacey for the interview, as well as all your awesome advice you’re constantly giving out on your website (I took a cue from her Queries Letter page-tons of helpful stuff on there!). Seriously, go check her out. You can go to her website here and make sure to follow her on Twitter (@StaceyONeale)
Jump ahead a few hours, it’s 1630, both girls are napping and we are starting to prepare for our return trip to the train station. I just step out of the shower when there’s a knock at the door. I am wrapped in a towel, so I peer through the peep hole to see a hotel receptionist. I assume they are wondering when we are leaving and I feel a bit guilty for showering in a free room. “ni hao,” I reply from behind the door. She begins talking quickly and excitedly and I hear “huzhao”. “huzhao?,” I inquire. Yes, your passports, she confirms in rapid Chinese. I fling open the door, towel wrapped and all, this is important business. They have found our passports after all! The cash is gone (we expected this, and quite honestly, we don’t care, we just want our passports back). Rob begins talking to her now, but we are drained and still a bit worn from our lack of sleep the night before. It takes a minute for it all to sink in. She confirms, they have found our passports and credit cards but they aren’t here, we will get them tomorrow, but we don’t know what time. “were there any train tickets in the wallet?” we ask. She doesn’t know. She also informs us that we can get a refund for our current tickets back to Beijing, but we can not be guaranteed there will be available train tickets tomorrow. We don’t care, we will not leave until we have our passports in hand. A bit of relief has washed over us, and yet there will not be complete ease until the passports are in our hand. Rob once again journeys back to Shiyan to refund our current train tickets. Here the policeman tells him that he is not certain if there are any credit cards in the wall. Fine, we will be happy with only our passports.
We have a feeling it’s going to be a close call at the end and the subtle differences between these two flagships will endear them to slightly different target audiences. Let’s dig into the details and see which one’s for you.
I’m sitting in the Denver airport trying hard to think of a way to end this; to do some sort of justice to the whole experience. I don’t think I can and I don’t think I’ll continue trying for much longer- so as my trip ended in an anticlimax I think I’ll end the blog in a similar manner: we traveled the country, pushed our limits, experienced new things, arrived at our destination, went our separate ways, will return again seeking more.
I learned about the discovery of Will’s body when I came across a link Amy put on Facebook. She only added “What an amazing life. Thinking today about Will’s family and friends.” The search for the high school grad had come to an unhappy end, but Amy linked to a video called “50″ by Will Norton. I got choked up when I watched it, kind of like the way I feel now as I write this.
Here’s the point – though they might begin as a response to real events, panic attacks are more likely to occur in the face of imagined danger. It takes a lot of professional and personal support and practice for an individual suffering from anxiety to realise that they’re actually not physically at risk.
And with that, chickadees, I’m off to walk into the sunshine and then to my desk until it’s time to see what I’m really made of.
Then, I think I should mention I have a Staff Meeting tomorrow. You know, that blessed free day Saturday? And, it's conveniently in the MIDDLE of my day. 2:30. Perfect. I love taking from the middle, especially if it's pie. Or pizza. Or even Watermelon.
To begin with, I loved the first Gintama. No other anime made me laugh as much as it, and neither did any combine comedy with seriousness as well as it. Not only that, but the characters were refreshing and unique. Everything from the over-the-top humor, to the sadomasochist Okita and the serious moments where the action was fantastic, made the anime for me. It’s not for everyone though, some episodes were boring while others were funny as hell. In any case I still think of it as a masterpiece.
Finally, spending time at an airport with a colleague recently he pointed out at the taxiing aircraft and said that
7. Christopher's
Since my angels (or as I sometimes referred to them after a long writing session, the boys) had both their feet on the ground (so to speak), I decided they should belong to sub-caste of angels, the very lowest of the lows. Terra Angeli: Latin for Earth Angels. Now the belief in angelic beings can be found in many of the world’s religions and I borrowed freely from Judaism, Christianity, Islam, and Hinduism. My Prologue gave a nod to the early Christian writing The Celestial Hierarchy and with my background in anthropology, any and all world cultures were grist for my mill, to be sure.
Today, I am delighted to welcome novelist Fanny Blake. Fanny's had an amazing career, working as a publisher for many years before becoming an author. She's penned best-selling non-fiction, ghost-written several celebrity autobiographies and has written two novels. Her latest, Women of a Dangerous Age, comes out on on April 26th by Blue Door. Fanny is also the Books Editor of Woman & Home.
Bonjour à toutes! Non, vous ne perdez pas la tête, vous connaissez ce visage que vous avez vu il y a quelques jours ici même... Mais avant tout, c'est l'heure de Cupcake! Cette semaine, Sari a choisi le thème "Rose et Rouge"! Et vous allez adorer les créations des Cupcakes! A gagner, 5 images au choix offertes par Pollycraft, et un bon d'achat de $20 offert par Simon Says Stamp!
from below the foot to below the knee is a quarter of the height of a man
Perhaps the most famous (or infamous) open-ended question is “How does this make you feel?” or some variation thereof. This has become a cliché in both journalism and therapy. The reason it is so widely used is that it’s so effective.
4) The romance. Yes, there is romance, and yes, it works for me. I mean, there's the whole best friend thing, and the mysterious guy thing, and both are captivating and vying for attention. And I love how Delaney doesn't know what to do and who to trust.
–$44 million for repairs to U.S. Dept. of Agriculture headquarters
Where: Bar's Everywhere
What to do with Pull Up Banners
The 0riginal 1955-56 recordings of Franco... in his teens, friends. Highly recommended CD!!!
I: Okay. I was just asking, my first question was if you’ve been doing anything musically oriented lately?
Would definitely recommend this recipe if you want to try a new healthier version of enchiladas! It also heats up well so you can bring it to work for lunch.
I’ve just stumbled across a really neat piece of research on host-parasite ecology. An article, provisionally available in BMC Ecology by Zohdy et al., describes movements of a species of louse that parasitises mouse lemurs. Occurring in Madagascar, mouse lemurs Microcebus rufus, are host to a species of louse, Lemurpediculus verruculosus (which is so highly host-specific it only occurs on M. rufus). The team of researchers did a mark-recapture study where they tracked the movements of lice between different hosts by marking them with nail polish and monitoring the dispersal of lice between different host lemurs.
Charities argue high bills contributed to the fatality rate.
Place the cupcakes in a pattern…pumpkin, dragee, leaf, dragee, pumpkin, dragee, leaf, dragee….
Worried about how to query? Jenny says, “Query letters can seem hard to write. But they don’t have to be. In fact, you can break a query letter into parts and tackle it part by part.” Other advice, “As you write don’t worry about the order. Do it as a puzzle then fit it all together.”
Fortunately, an experience of failure, a re-direction into an arts degree and a few inspirational educators set you on your true path. Your wish to commune with nature and connect with people was granted during your first overseas trip, a backpacking tour of Europe. Your awakening from the dream of youth was gradual and mostly gentle, yet harsh in significant ways. Over the years, the urge for adventure took you away from the books, to Nepal and Papua New Guinea and most recently, Canada. And throughout the journey to here, the call to experiential and interpersonal learning has been fundamental to your approach to education and life itself.
My sis-in-law was mad her Mom had to pay, but didn’t seem to have any other solutions and agreed I should not have to pay for her brother. We both agreed what a piece of work my brother-in-law was, wondered why with every opportunity that came his way – he always chose the wrong, unethical path. I have not spoken or seen my brother-in-law since I terminated him, it’s been 10 years and I don’t think I will ever again, unless pressed by family situations like a funeral.
The growth in police community support officers (PCSOs) and other civilian staff has outstripped the rise in fully sworn officers, according to a report by the Police Federation.
GFZ Potsdam – Earthquake Bulletin
Chris Tse
No I wasn't.
So here’s to being 30. It’s been pretty good so far, frankly, and let’s hope it continues to be awesome.
- 200 g crushed tomatoes
:: My baby is going to be two in eight days. WHAT??? How is that possible?
Well, here's a peek inside...
We’re all aware that the main function of an economic chief is not to write so-called economic papers. His functions include proposing economic policies, giving so-called economic advice to the president, assessing fiscal and monetary matters and balance of payments, among others. As a newly appointed economic chief, will Balisacan help push this cash-strapped nation toward a higher degree of national bankruptcy, statism, and economic crisis? Let’s wait and see.
Metallic silver and red ribbon finish off the tag.
In a blender jar add the coffee ice cream, milk and sugar. Whip till well mixed. Pour it to a tall glass and top it with whipped cream and some chocolate arts, serve immediately.
I must add that today weather isnt helping. I mean I live in Ohio and its almost 60 degrees in December. Really how wonderful is that. I dont like the cold weather. I quess having many years of really cold weather will do that. I also know that we are going to have a wicked winter because of the weather patterns now. Trust me come Jan I will be mad and miserable because of the cold, but today I will take the weather and just run with it. I dont want to think about cold and snow but because of the weather it doesnt seem like christmas time. I am having a hard time with getting ready for christmas. If it wasnt for my kids I would just skip it. Just Kidding.
The disruption arises in part from "volatile winds" which are said to be carrying clouds of volcanic ash down from Iceland over the northern British Isles. But those same winds which caused the rough weather yesterday must also have dispersed the ash.
With care
Then there is Eddie Peake, he recently filmed a naked football game, now I like football and I like men, surely this is too good to be true. This time he is developing something new though… open to seeing that as well, nothing wrong with a bit of artistic flesh after all.
Still on the subject of music and memories, ‘Black Betty’ by Ram Jam was on the radio the other day. Straight away it got me thinking of my underage drinking days at The Blacksmiths arms in St Albans. ‘Black Betty’ was a favourite on the jukebox at that time in the side bar of the pub, which in those days tended to be frequented by Goths nursing a pint of Cider and Black in fingerless gloved hands, and heavy metallers slumped in dark corners and around pinball tables.Some of the people may have looked a little intimidating, but I can’t ever remember any trouble kicking off.
That being said, I love my current job. It's also a dream job, and I have a shit ton of control. The first zombie game I pitched was in 1997. I've always been a Dawn of the Dead fan, since middle school, and never felt like people made zombie games right. There's a level of gore, fun cheese, fear, and emptiness that most games today just can't pull off. Maybe they're afraid of it. I don't know. Weird time in my life, man. It's too good, my regrets are not taking a dream job because I'm currently in a dream job.
How often do we ignore needs in daily practice, classrooms, schools, and jurisdictions? No one is so expert they can ignore the wisdom of others. Students lose. Educators need to boldly go where educators have not gone before.
Elephant Ears
Among the arteries into the city that could be targeted were the Brooklyn Bridge, the Lincoln Tunnel and the Holland Tunnel, causing traffic chaos and bringing Manhattan to a standstill.
Wutzler P, Farber I, Wagenpfeil S, Bisanz H, Tischer A. Seroprevalence of varicella-zoster virus in the German population. Vaccine 2001; 20: 121-124.
Wow looks like I am behind again on my goal to review 104 (2 beers a week) beers. I should be on 32 right now but as you can see I am only on 27. I can probably get up to 29 this weekend but we will see there is a lot of time left this year to make it happen.
While it is possible that other love spells existed that would have invoked him for homoerotic ends, we simply don’t have them, and can’t therefore say with any certainty that such magical activities did exist. It would seem unlikely that people would have been unaware of the homoerotic dimensions of the god generally, though. But, as with many things, we should not necessarily grant that history must be the sole source for what is done or for what is considered “valid” in the modern world and in modern practice; likewise, we should also not disqualify or dismiss what insights it may have. Therefore, the evidence of the love spell should not discount the possibility that Antinoan homoerotic love spells existed; and likewise, because of the existence of this love spell, we in the modern world should never have the viewpoint that Antinous’ ancient cultus was only for the homoerotically inclined.
A more enlightened approach would have been to engage in a discussion about why I came up with the position and what assumptions were key to making that position work. That’s what I wanted to do, but I just didn’t have the energy anymore. All day, every day, it seemed like that’s all I did. It was tiresome. I tried to stay as quiet as possible and let the officers run things with “I intend to . . .” but top-down was ingrained in how we operated.
3. My favorite movies to watch while I scrap, Lord Of The Rings Trilogy
As like flushing a nide of pheasants, the whole scene exploded into a melee. My sword drawn, I fought two guards simultaneously, then the last. Having dropped all three to the ground, I was left facing the villainous gang member. Thinking better of the situation presented before him, he fled hastily towards the door, only to be captured by a swarm of oncoming guards. I to John Crow, and passing him a sword from one of the guards, we were left with no other option but to climb a nearby flight of stairs. Reached the top to find ourselves confronted with a door. Blunderbuss unlocked it efficiently, thence found ourselves upon the roof.
37. Roll of Thunder, Hear My Cry - Taylor (1976)
Of course, just thinking about that movie reminded me of how much it freaked me out. In fact, it freaked me out to the point when I saw Ted Levine years later as Captain Stottlemeyer on Monk (I love that show.) I freaked out all over again. This, of course, led to another twisted conversation with my hubby.
At school, The Builder and I helped him put his bag away. We found his table where, to his delight, he is seated with four friends and a 'new guy'. And then he turned to us: "You can go now." A kiss and it was all over.
Of course this doesn’t HAVE to be fire. It could be working out in a wood shop or just browsing the clearance section at Books-A-Million. Either way, I don’t have to talk to anybody, I can just focus on the pretty colors of the covers and move on to the next.
Anne Campbell (Con) 124
Good Monday to you all, 3 more cards for your perusal on the way to 1500.
You can adjust this so the box scrolls upwards or down, and also adjust the speed and the width of the pictures. This is great for grab buttons, blog awards, favourite sites - and the buttons are clickable too!
I don’t know who the woman in the magazine is – don’t need to know. I only know that she resonated with something in my subconscious. I know that she is Grace.
One selfsame figure sits or walks or leans:
When the sons of Zinyemba saw that Chinamora had refused they went to Mazarura who was one of the families of Chinamora. They asked him secretly. They gave him the woman and cattle, sheep and goats. They begged him to kill Hundungu and Mazarura agreed. He accepted the gifts and went secretly to the country of Mangwende to kill Hundungu. When Chinamora heard that he told all the people not to follow the advice. When Hundungu heard that Mazarura had come with an army he called his people to kill Mazarura. The leaders of the army of Hundungu were: Gezi, Nyarugwe and Mhuka, who had a gona which he was given by Chaminuka. Hundungu’s son Mungate led them against Mazarura. Mazarura had eaten the medicine ndudzo. These two armies fought at a place called Gupiro near Chitsanza. During the first clash there was nobody on both sides killed. Later Mazarura fired his gun at Hundungu’s army, and Mungate who was standing on an anthill fell. He thought it was Hundungu, especially as Hundungu’s were running away.
Insider tip? Laura Vela's entire collection was inspired by her trip to Barcelona.
The reason for her giddiness was because, for all of last year, when our children attended school in Loudoun County in Virginia, sweets for birthdays were banned.
HIS ACCEPTANCE!!!,…..
This excerpt is from my fantasy adventure story; our protagonist is 17-year-old Nova, who just lost her little sister in a horrific murder. She wants to go after her sister’s killer. This is a piece of the short story from the actual novel.
I am going to start on Feb 1. This will give me the next week to get myself organised. To plan my time and organise my life to.
Oscar Wilde said that a cynic is a man who knows the price of everything, and the value of nothing. With this cynicism-free act, you've demonstrated that a gesture can be worth tenfold the value of any goods that it contains. I'm drinking the Racer 5 now, and am happy to report that it's bringing me a huge amount of pleasure, not just by being a good beer, but also in the spirit in which it was given.
Prepare a casserole dish (anything above one quart will do, and non-stick cooking spray is optional).
It's another cover that wowed me when I first saw it and has a fantastic premise (genetically engineered non-humans) in a lush and detailed world with a scary caste system. It's a crazy good read! So after you've read her wonderful post, please leave Karen a comment for a chance to win Tankborn.
1) Pick 5 blogs that you consider deserve this award for their creativity, design, interesting material, and also for contributing to the blogging community, no matter what language.
No Tory councillor has had the guts to speak out publicly against this idiotic scheme, which is costing the more terrible loss of business for all our high streets, and changing the face of our town centres for ever, with the threatened closure of so many businesses - for example at least six shops in North Finchley are closing now. In private they all admit it has been a disaster, but they appear to be incapable of convincing their Cabinet colleagues to do anything about it.
Dear Mr. Smoker,
No news on the Interleukin-2 injections yet. I dropped an email on Dr. G asking for an update because I have one lump that could use some attention. Since Dr. Ohashi (first mentioned in a posting a few weeks back) is interested in acquiring some “fresh” tumour tissue I could get Dr. M to dispatch the lump to her when I see him next week. One way or another I’d like to get the thing dealt with, although it doesn’t bother me as much as it used to and there is only the one.
“If you've truly lost all hope of finding the right man, you could always follow the example of the Taiwanese woman who got married to herself.
Back in the day I was one of those flag-headband-wearing morons, whooping and hollering, oohing and aahing during the national holiday, and how I long to be that idiotic again. But alas, nary a flag headband is to be found on this side of the pond, or if they exist, they’re well hidden from the likes of me! It was just so lonely waving my little American flag around the office that I gave up on the Fourth of July altogether, and I really tried not to think about what I was missing.
If I could turn back time, I would have handled things a bit differently. Instead of suffering, I would have made Chris suffer.
I was no victim. I always had a choice, but I cushioned or quickly dismissed tensions. I wanted this to work, to click, to make the save, because I'd been a quart low on save for some time. Thinking sometimes I had to do penance for being alive(after all, I did go to Catholic grammar school).
still working on remodeling house
According to this study. as with many illness, prevention is the first line defense. One preventative measure is to “rely exclusively on well-known and reputable sources for news and other information.” Another way is to instruct your community to “practice constant vigilance in order to spot diviseness and hate in…communities.
Could the title be any more misleading? Fuck Facebook and the movie about it. This film is the real social network. This film is not about garbage at all. It is not about a dump at all. It is about human dignity. At its most essential core and therefore in its most profound expression. And just as essentially and profoundly a part of this, it is about community. Deep and serious social solidarity. Jesus Christ - it's about love.
On local television (which I watch in the hotel) there is, of course, no foreign news. It is like living in the self-contained bubble of a medieval village with no transport and little outside news. It is, in fact, like living in The Village in the 1960s TV show The Prisoner. Everything is happy and good and free and clean and smiling and caring within the village.
The terrain had two hills and a woods (yeah, too lazy to put the trees on, sorry). They were all rough terrain for movement, the hills provided unobstructed LOS if you were on top and of course blocked it, and the woods gave +1 Armor cover if completely inside against Archery.
I was assured by many that Rory had gone to a better place and that God had a plan for him.
-On the flip side, the performances by Joseph Addai and Dominic Rhodes will put Edgerrin James's career in doubt. James seemed a lock for the Hall, but his performance with the Cardinals and his replacements' success make him look much less worthy. He could have come back to Indy for slightly less money. Now, his apparent greed for the extra $1MM might not be worth it to him in 20 years. All because of one game where his former team didn't miss him.
Slightly less concerning — but only because the frequency of their threats of violence has made them mundane — was the ANC Youth League's declaration of war.
1 potentialities
That is a really, really good question.
It is impossible to love cold, unnatural tower blocks or office buildings built along these lines, or places dominated by such buildings. But this is not just aesthetics; it is about our very identity, which is reinforced by the reciprocal relationship between people and the places in which they live. Building on what we have in a similar scale and style maintains continuity and helps to focus culture and identity. National and local governments alike are destroying places that are sanctioned by time and use, where communities have grown up and grown together instinctively. People’s natural bonding instincts are thwarted by high-rise buildings that separate them from one another and are not physically conducive to developing community spirit — the sense of belonging and of knowing with whom you belong.
I’m back on my soap box again and boy have I missed the limelight! During these weeks off I’ve been working on a great line-up of blog posts to share with you. Stay tuned for posts from yours truly starting up again next Monday. Are you excited?!
Anyway, the selling price for the character in question was 8 billion ISK, which seems like a lot. Just a billion of anything is a lot to me.
"I don't know if you ever had to deal with a car seat, but they are a pain in the ass." I said. "They do not make it easy to adjust and re-adjust the straps and buckles and seat belts for the weight and size of another kid. I would have put my kid in the car seat out of the simple fact it was already fitted perfect for him."
And they told me about a house in Fairhaven that was a month to month lease. Less than two weeks later, we were in Bellingham.
The workers slept in an on-site trailer-dorm and got to work early, using mostly hand tools. They are building clusters of high rise residences, fairly dense urban housing. The government is energetically meeting the needs of the rural people who stream steadily into Shanghai, where they have the opportunity to make a fortune, or at least a living.
STEVEN: I'm terrible with hats. My favorites are broad brimmed panamas but they're the hardest to take care of. The most effective one I own, a baseball cap with an integrated drape to protect the neck and the sides of the face, looks the dorkiest. I used to wear a Khaki fedora reminiscent of Indiana Jones but it got trashed. Thankfully no balds spots yet so it hasn't been critical, but I am a redhead so keeping the sun off my skin is a priority.
You must know that our God whom we trust will agree
To dull masturbation I must regress
The ancient Greeks said that ambrosia was the food of the gods, which lets us know that Greece must have been a Northern state. Down in the South, we prefer boiled peanuts.
It’s your last hour on Earth. What are you going to do? The answer was clearly stated, “Punch Drake in the face. #YOLO – Unanimous decision.”
The need to reach the top of the mountain, to accomplish our desires and be successful, is the natural impulse to move toward experiencing greater happiness. The difficulty lies in believing that success means being all-powerful; we forget that there is a difference between being powerful in the sense of being egotistic and controlling, and being powerful meaning full of loving kindness and compassion. True power is not corruptive or abusive, as we are seeing in Washington and London; it transcends greed and serves for the benefit of all.
‘As chief executive of News International, which owns the NoW, Ms Brooks has always endorsed the “rogue reporter” defence, which has maintained, since Mulcaire and royal reporter Clive Goodman were sent to prison, that they had been acting of their own accord, unlicensed by their superiors. With the airing of accusations in The New York Times and elsewhere, and the drip of new evidence from civil cases brought by celebrities, this has come to look increasingly thin. The removal of the paper’s news editor, Ian Edmondson, last month led cynics to wonder “how many rogues make a conspiracy”.’
As someone who was Editor of a weekly newspaper, and who has won national awards for my campaigning and writing, I happen to think that Sutton are failing to utilize my talents. In addition to my ward duties I’ll just have to direct my energies instead towards Liberal Left, the new organisation campaigning for the party to return to social-Liberal values of equality and a change in direction of the whole party.
Even the glyphs of Lifebloom and Fire Silence… not to mention turning yourself into a two person ‘mount’.
So most of you suggested that I wear my hair up for wedding..
"I'll be leaving for a few weeks," I said. "I'm going to Italy. Visiting grandma's old stomping grounds."
Joining us this week are Sarah Hill, Angela Gutshall, and Erin Yamabe. CSI Detective Tina Walker is also on the Paper Bakery design team.
I digress, but let’s finish all the awards in the process. If Kevin Love got Minnesota into the playoffs he would get my MVP vote, but he got injured and they’re not a competitive team. So, I’ll give him somewhat of a consolation with the Most Improved Player award. Cleveland point guard Kyrie Irving made multiple game-winning baskets and is the Rookie of the Year, posting 19.6 points, 5.6 assists, 4 rebounds, and a steal per game.
for your wisdom, strength and worth
I've slowed down on my writing, not from lack of trying either. I just sit here staring at the computer screen. Maybe my mind is constipated. I'm 31,000 words into it and have a plot line, though it's not totally solid yet. I'm not worried about that though. This is a sequel, so the characters already know who they are and what they want. If I step out of line and write something they don't like, I hear about it.
Reviewing the last week was like thinking about the funniest moments someone could have in one entire life. I spent some amazing days together with one of my favourite people and some quality time yesterday with another favourite one. It seems as if half of Europe is glowing and so I couldn't resist but to take one of my some-while-ago purchases and put it on. This jacket is the perfect creation for a wonderful day out and meanwhile keeps some flashy details that let it even match for a casual dinner. The material (100 % cotton) feels supercomfy and rather gave me the impression of wearing a jumper instead of a jacket that slowly but surely makes it into my spring/summer-favourites list. The neon stripes add that vibrant touch and then again maintain that certain order (I love) when mingling with low-keyed grey. The destroyed tucks at the end of the sleeves and the neckline enduce that little rebellious something, which builds a contrast to the cut and material. The detail that adds this elegant and special twist are the golden chains and especially that oversized zipper. I just love how different elements come together on one item and create a completely new and refreshing look.
a hippy chick, a throwback.
Seven of 10 recommendations made by the PSC in its interim report had been implemented including the use of indelible ink, advance voting for armed forces and police personnel, cleaning up the electoral roll, doing away with objection period for candidates on nomination day, and providing facilities for Malaysians overseas to register as postal voters.
"What is the most resilient parasite? An idea. Resilient, highly contagious. Once an idea has taken hold of the brain it's almost impossible to eradicate..."
Speaking of crockery -- check out that jumbo Francais chocolat cup. I found it and its matching plate/saucer at Value Village for $2. I was tagging along with the kids last weekend. They were planning for their Halloween party costumes. I was just along for the ride. I also scored some vintage ric-rack in green and peachypink, as well as large embroidery hoops. I like those stitcheries framed in hoops you see all over the Internet, so I plan to give them a try. I also discovered that Berni likes to do free motion embroidery and the large wooden hoops make her happy to do my bidding. We are in negotiations vis a vis the free motion quilting of the bag. Watch this space!
They done fell through
I'll make a note of the £2.50 or so that I've just saved by NOT stopping for coffee. (See - I don't actually have a clue how much a latte costs - I just hand over a tenner and stuff the change in my bag til the next time). Same will apply each time I see a new item of clothing online or in a shop that I'd otherwise just buy - this however, is gonna need LOTS of moral support - I'll probably exchange my shopping addiction for a tweeting addiction!
NOTE If you are like me, and do not have a hand mixer but instead a stand mixer (I know, that is reverse of how it should be), you can heat up your mixture in your mixer bowl and as long as it reaches the 160F for 15-20 seconds, you can remove from the heat and beat your sugar mixture into frosting that way.
“Okay,” he said with a grin, looking back at me.
The girls are great. Super fun ages right now. Well, Abby is getting a little whiney, but we're nipping that in the bud the best we can and she is starting to really show that she understands the difference between "whiney voices" and "nice voices" The thing that is hard is when she uses a nice voice and the answer is still "no" ...cue loud whiney voice.
07. Dreaming of a Little Cabin*
“I have delighted to do Your pleasure, O my Elohim, And Your Torah is within my heart1.” Footnote: 1Ps. 37:31, Ps. 119:11, Isa. 51:7, Heb. 10:7-9.” (Psalms 40:8 The Scriptures 1998+)
Why do i still wait when we know
Length: 12" (?)
On the Guardian Books Blog this week, John Self started a fascinating debate that went so viral it spawned a popular twitter hashtag #famousforthewrongbook. The piece, which asked for examples where an author was famous for a piece of work that actually wasn’t their best, confirmed what I’ve been saying for a long while, and what’s very pertinent here: when you get a game-changer of a writer, their best work tends to come later in their career, but their “great” work comes at the start. The numbers of diaries and letters included in the 600+ comments on the post further gets the underlying message across. Editing polishes what’s there, makes it “sing”. But the actual step-change, what *is* there to start with that a person spends their whole life perfecting, that is most visible when the editorial hand is most distant.
I hope you are having as much fun with our collaboration week as Laurel and I are. I had no clue how much this would be. Today’s project is to use the colors: Kraft, white, teal/robin’s egg blue, and red.
Sorry to keep this short and sweet. I'm off to the movies with my baby girl who just turned 27 on the 18th. We are going to see The Vow with Rachel McAdams and the yummy Channing Tatum.
Good evening peeps,
Because all of these things, these bright and beautiful things, led me to appreciate and love who you are even more.
Officers are looking for nervousness or other signs of "distress" — behavioural profiling. Sela rejects the argument that profiling is discriminatory.
10/18/2010 – 12/31/2010: +11.94%
1067 **D-II/22(A)/1990. “St. Paul: The Old Law and the New.” Faculty Workshop, The School of Law, Duke University, Durham, North Carolina. (Incorporated in Item C-1993(2), above, pp. 39-47.)
Salt relied solely on the Steel's masher, as did Mann, Crossman and Paulin.
The clip above demonstrates the living conditions becoming more widespread for retired people in California. Nobody wishes to live in their car but that is becoming the reality, and increasingly will continue to, for retirees who have been honest, honourable, hard working citizens as they watch their pensions depleted by Wall Street at the same time that landlords and care homes have to raise rents to pay the interest or dividends (sometimes both) demanded by Wall Street. The human cost is senior citizens, some of whom are disabled, living in their cars.
A Poundland getting looted... Not in Wolverhampton it should be said.
This article helped me with house design really works. It’s not understood very well by most people. But according to the article there are 8 benefits to good design. Those being:
The finished quilt was ready to give to Jane on March 24, when we celebrated Grandma Elma’s 93rd birthday. Jane and I met for the first time. It was a good day for many reasons, a small one was that this project was completed!
Release Date: 1st Febraury 2012
He felt cold at first, but after a moment a warm sensation slipped from her heart down her arm. Her head grew heavy and she closed her eyes. A dim memory - or was it a dream - teased her. A large stone pyramid. A room of gold. The dead. The Olympics. Blood...
a. What you would do when you were sick before kids: curl up in bed with a box of Kleenex, daytime TV and some OJ. This could feasibly go on for 3-4 days. People offer you chicken soup, drugs and whatever else you might need. Poor thing.
I have a feeling that the posts dealing with this subject, Islamic Jerusalem, are bound to provoke some people out there, both people who are afraid of a “Judaization of Jerusalem,” as well as people having troubles with the notion of an “Islamic Jerusalem.” Nevertheless, that is going to be the subject for a number of posts, I’m not sure how many, where I’m going to deal with my studies on the subject.
The monastic profession of the ancients was an act of voluntary devotion. The inconstant fanatic was threatened with the eternal vengeance of the God whom he deserted, but the doors of the monastery were still open for repentance. Those monks whose conscience was fortified by reason or passion were at liberty to resume the character of men and citizens; and even the spouses of Christ might accept the legal embraces of an earthly lover.
d) The system of racial profiling (associated with marijuana use) against black users would be greatly reduced considering the fact that many of the current arrests report only minor possessions (that, if readjusted, would revise the “effectiveness” of racial profiling).
I hope you are all having a great week. I have been busy trying to get some major cleaning done here and organizing my craft room as always. I am so pleased with the coloring I did on this picture. I usually pick the coloring apart but I can see some improvment if I look at some of my former pics. I followed the sketch but made it into a 5.5 gate fold card. I am entering this card into The Sugar Bowl challenge -sketch.
It is simply my life.
